Comey's decision shaped the 2016 election in a lot of ways--most of which helped Russia. As far as learning and/or guessing how Russia's active measures worked then and could work in the near future, it's worth looking into.

Maybe the biggest impact was how Comey helped validate Russia and Trump's "the system is rigged" narrative (see: https://www.google.com/search?q=system+rigged+site%3Aallnewspipeline.com+OR+site%3Aantiwar.com+OR+site%3Abeforeitsnews.com+OR+site%3Aconsortiumnews.com+OR+site%3Acounterpunch.org+OR+site%3Aglobalresearch.ca+OR+site%3Ainfowars.com+OR+site%3Alewrockwell.com+OR+site%3Amintpressnews.com+OR+site%3Aopednews.com+OR+site%3Aprisonplanet.com+OR+site%3Aronpaulinstitute.org+OR+site%3Athirdworldtraveler.com+OR+site%3Atruth-out.org+OR+site%3Awashingtonsblog.com+OR+site%3Azerohedge.com).

Comey's July 5th statement made Clinton look guilty (especially to those on the right), with some scratching their heads at what exactly the difference between "extreme carelessness" (as Comey put it) and "gross negligence" is. It created the perception--which some in the media inflamed--that the Justice System was letting Hillary off without a trial:


https://fivethirtyeight.com/features/trumps-system-is-rigged-argument-is-working/
	Apr. 23, 2016 at 10:30 AM
	Trump’s ‘System Is Rigged’ Argument Is Working
	He’s gaining in the polls, and the media is playing along.


http://www.foxnews.com/opinion/2016/07/05/gregg-jarrett-fbi-director-calls-clinton-careless-his-recommendations-make-no-sense.html
	Gregg Jarrett: FBI Director calls Clinton ‘careless’. His recommendations make no sense

	It makes no legal sense. I suspect attorneys across America are scratching their heads.           
	James Comey, Director of the FBI, declared Tuesday that Hillary Clinton was “extremely careless” in her handling of very sensitive and highly classified information on her unauthorized and unsecured email server while serving as Secretary of State.

	Those words, “extremely careless” mean something important in the law.  Consider the relevant federal criminal statute which reads: 

		“Whoever, being entrusted with… any document relating to the national defense… through gross negligence permits the same to be removed from its proper place of custody… shall be fined under this title or imprisoned not more than ten years, or both.”  (18 U.S.C., section 793-f) 

	The key phrase is “gross negligence”. What does it mean?  Every lawyer and judge in America knows its meaning. It is defined in standard jury instructions and just about every legal treatise that exists.

	It means extremely careless. 

	Black’s Law Dictionary is the legal bible upon which attorneys rely. Check it out. You’ll find that gross negligence is described and defined as extreme carelessness.  At least, my edition does.

	...Since Comey, by his own words, all but declared that Clinton broke a criminal law, how could he then say he would not recommend criminal prosecution? Again, it makes no sense. 

	Comey is a former U.S. Attorney. Yet, he exhibited an astonishing ignorance of the law. He laid out a case of gross negligence constituting a crime, defined it with the words “extremely careless” and then promptly proceeded to ignore the law. 


http://insider.foxnews.com/2016/07/05/giuliani-comey-made-special-exception-clintons
 	'So Discouraging': Giuliani Says Comey Made 'Special Exception for the Clintons' 


http://www.cnn.com/2016/07/05/politics/election-2016-donald-trump-hillary-clinton-fbi/index.html
	Trump: FBI decision on Clinton proves 'our system is totally rigged'

	Donald Trump on Tuesday night repeatedly hammered his message that there is a "rigged system" at work, pointing specifically to the FBI decision to not recommend criminal charges against Hillary Clinton for her use of email while serving as secretary of state.

	Trump seized on the FBI's decision as he addressed the crowd of fervent supporters in this potential battleground state, calling it the "best evidence ever that we've seen that our system is totally rigged."

	He accused Clinton, the presumptive Democratic nominee, of bribing the U.S. attorney general -- offering little to back up the dramatic accusation. And he called the FBI's decision, announced earlier Tuesday by the agency's director James Comey, a "tragedy."

	"Everybody thought based on what was being said she was guilty. She was guilty. And it turned out that we're not going to press charges. It's really amazing," Trump said as his crowd of more than 2,200, according to the theater, erupted in a chorus of boos.

	"We have a rigged system, folks," he added.


http://www.foxnews.com/transcript/2016/10/26/bill-oreilly-is-our-political-system-rigged.html
	Bill O'Reilly: Is our political system rigged? 

	...The appearance of corruption is staggering. Talking Points is not saying there is corruption. But the optics are awful and FBI Director James Comey had to know that. If you combine the McCabe stuff, we just told you about, with Comey not calling for a grand jury and basically giving Secretary Clinton every benefit of every doubt, again, you have the appearance of impropriety. So it's no surprise. Many Americans, including Mr. Trump, believe the system is rigged. Did I mention Attorney General Loretta Lynch meeting with Bill Clinton during the investigation?

	I mean, come on. Again, the vote cannot be possibly rigged two weeks from tonight. And Mr. Trump should accept whatever happens at that vote, unless there is compelling evidence of corruption. Undermining our electoral system is not a patriotic thing. But overall, if you don't think the federal political and justice system has severe problems, you are living in the Land of Oz. And that's "The Memo".


http://www.cnbc.com/2016/10/22/trump-gains-on-clinton-poll-shows-rigged-message-resonates.html
	Trump gains on Clinton, poll shows 'rigged' message resonates

	...The Reuters/Ipsos data showed only half of Republicans would accept Clinton as their president, and nearly 70 percent of them said a Clinton victory would be because of illegal voting or vote rigging.

	Trump's crowd chanted "Lock her up!" at a rally in Johnstown, Pennsylvania after he declared Clinton a "corrupt globalist," a reference to campaign documents released by WikiLeaks in which Clinton was quoted advocating free trade and open borders.

	After the chant went around the room for several seconds, Trump responded, "Don't worry, that whole thing will be looked into." 


http://www.bbc.com/news/election-us-2016-36860740
	US election: Do 'lock her up' chants mark a new low?

	Many of the speakers have focused more on the faults of Hillary Clinton than the virtues of Donald Trump.

	...Much of the criticism from the stage, from Mr Christie and others, was about Mrs Clinton's use of a private email account while she was serving as secretary of state.

	An FBI investigation said she was "extremely careless" but found her actions didn't warrant criminal prosecution. 


http://abcnews.go.com/Politics/majority-disapproves-decision-charge-clinton-emails-poll/story?id=40445344
 	A majority of Americans disapprove of the FBI's recommendation not to charge Hillary Clinton with a crime over her handling of email while secretary of state, and a similar number in a new ABC News/Washington Post poll say the issue leaves them worried about how she would handle her responsibilities as president if elected. 

	...Overall, 56 percent disapprove of FBI Director James Comey's recommendation not to charge Clinton, while just 35 percent approve. Similarly, 57 percent say the incident makes them worried about how Clinton might act as president if she is elected, with most very worried about it. 


http://thehill.com/homenews/campaign/290892-trump-says-second-amendment-folks-could-stop-clinton
	Trump: 'Second Amendment people' could stop Clinton

	...Trump was discussing the possibility that Clinton, the Democratic nominee, would be able to appoint liberal justices to the Supreme Court if she wins the race for the White House.

	He then said that there was nothing that could be done in that scenario, before mentioning “Second Amendment folks.”

	“Hillary wants to abolish, essentially abolish the Second Amendment,” Trump said to boos from the crowd.

	“By the way, if she gets to pick her judges, nothing you can do folks,” he then added.

	“Though the Second Amendment people, maybe there is, I don't know.”


http://www.cnn.com/2016/10/26/politics/joe-walsh-donald-trump-protest-tweet/index.html
	Ex-congressman: 'If Trump loses, I'm grabbing my musket'

	...Walsh, who was elected with support from the tea party movement, is now a conservative talk radio host, tweeted Wednesday: "On November 8th, I'm voting for Trump. On November 9th, if Trump loses, I'm grabbing my musket. You in?"


http://fortune.com/2016/07/15/hillary-clinton-email-scandal-poll/
	Hillary Clinton Survived Her Email Scandal, But Not Unscathed, New Poll Shows

	Hillary Clinton enters the summer damaged by perceptions that she violated the law by using a private email system while serving as secretary of state, a new Associated Press-GfK poll finds.

	More than half of Americans think the presumptive Democratic presidential nominee broke the law by using a private email account and server at the State Department and nearly 4 in 10 think she did so intentionally, according to the poll.

	..."She's innocent until proven guilty, but to me the FBI director called her guilty and then gave her a pass card," said James Thompson, a 57-year-old Republican from Colchester, Connecticut. "If that was anyone else in this world, they would have been gone. They would have been down the river. They would have been in jail."


http://www.washingtontimes.com/news/2016/jul/5/hillary-clinton-emails-only-american-people-can-fi/
	Only the American people can fix this now

	Obama, FBI Director James Comey let Hillary off the hook

	So there you have it.  We now know the results of the FBI investigation into Hillary Clinton’s email practices while secretary of State: No charges even though the FBI director himself said she was extremely negligent with classified information, including special compartmental access information, and there is a high likelihood foreign entities accessed this data.  

	...If I had negligently taken TS SCI information out of secure environment and opened it up to possibility of theft by a foreign adversary, I can guarantee you I would have been thrown in jail for years.  
	The Obama administration simply let Hillary Clinton off the hook for criminal behavior.  They did this because they are criminal themselves, through and through.  

	Today I realized that the America I knew is no more.  It is gone. It has been stolen, corrupted by the largest organized crime syndicate ever known to man, the Democratic Party.  

	...Now we have a criminal gang openly flouting the legal system, backed by a corrupt, cheerleading media.  An elite oligarchy is in charge, that is above the law and has destroyed trust in our rule of law.  We are no better than Vladimir Putin’s Russia, where this type of thing is commonplace, where freedom and democracy are only a sham, to be trotted out for pictures.  This is no less threatening than the South seceding from the Union.  This is sedition.

	This cannot stand.  

	In the late 18th century, we fought a revolution over much worse—a tax on tea, taxation without representation.  This is no longer about partisan politics.  This is no longer about conservatism.  This is about what is right and wrong.  This is about freedom.  This is about the entire notion of America itself.   

	America is dying. 

	...If Hillary Clinton is elected president, we will no longer have a country.  We will have a totalitarian oligarchy.

	This can no longer be fixed by the system.  This can only be fixed by the American people themselves.  We fought a revolution for less.  


http://www.rawstory.com/2016/09/georgia-voter-predicts-civil-war-if-clinton-wins-patriots-are-going-to-overthrow-the-government/
	Georgia voter predicts civil war if Clinton wins: ‘Patriots are going to overthrow the government’


http://www.nbcnews.com/card/pence-revolution-rally-goer-dont-say-n664776
	 Mike Pence had to talk down a supporter at an Iowa town hall Tuesday suggesting a "revolution" if Hillary Clinton becomes president.

	The woman, who identified herself as Rhonda, told the GOP vice presidential nominee that she was worried because "our kids' futures depend on this election."

	"I will tell you just for me — and I don't want this to happen — but I will tell you for me, personally, if Hillary Clinton gets in ... I'm ready for a revolution because we can't have her in," she said in an emotional moment.

	Pence, who remains steadfast to running mate Donald Trump, interjected: "Yeah, you don't want — don't say that." 


http://www.newsmax.com/Politics/presidential-election-election-hillary-clinton-james-comey/2016/11/06/id/757336/
	Trump on FBI Probe: Proves System 'Rigged'

	Donald Trump on Sunday criticized James Comey for his announcement that the FBI had not changed its conclusion regarding her emails, telling a crowd in Michigan that it was hard to believe the agency could review "650,000 new emails in eight days."

	"Right now, she is being protected by a rigged system. It's a totally rigged system. I've been saying it for a long time," said Trump.



The core of Trump's campaign message was of populist "outsider" campaigning against a corrupt, "rigged system." The decision not to indict helped validate this message for some, as well as galvanize Trump's anti-establishment base.

For Russia, the appearance of a rigged justice system might have helped drive public anger and distrust toward the U.S. Government and media:


http://www.gallup.com/poll/193832/americans-satisfaction-drops-sharply.aspx
	July 21, 2016
	Americans' Satisfaction With U.S. Drops Sharply

	Americans' satisfaction with the way things are going in the U.S. dropped 12 percentage points in the past month, amid high-profile police killings of black men and mass shootings of police. Currently, 17% of Americans are satisfied with the state of affairs in the U.S.


http://www.gallup.com/poll/195542/americans-trust-mass-media-sinks-new-low.aspx
	September 14, 2016
	Americans' Trust in Mass Media Sinks to New Low

	Americans' trust and confidence in the mass media "to report the news fully, accurately and fairly" has dropped to its lowest level in Gallup polling history, with 32% saying they have a great deal or fair amount of trust in the media. This is down eight percentage points from last year.


Presumably this is something Russia wants in general--the more untrustworthy the U.S. "establishment," the easier it is for Russian propaganda to gain Americans' trust instead.

Comey's decision--and the email scandal overall--also helped Russia make the 2016 election angry and divisive. As a general rule, corrupt politicians like Clinton and Trump are more divisive--political polarization has a way of making partisans hyper-aware of flaws in the leaders of the opposing party, but blind to the flaws in members of their own:


http://www.theatlantic.com/politics/archive/2014/09/how-politics-breaks-our-brains-and-how-we-can-put-them-back-together/453315/
	How Politics Breaks Our Brains, and How We Can Put Them Back Together

	We're partisans by nature, and once we pick a side we see the world in red or blue.

	...The NYU team is trying to show that our brains are hardwired for partisanship and how that skews our perceptions in public life. Research at NYU and elsewhere is underscoring just how blind the "us-versus-them" mind-set can make people when they try to process new political information. Once this partisanship mentality kicks in, the brain almost automatically pre-filters facts—even noncontroversial ones—that offend our political sensibilities.

	"Once you trip this wire, this trigger, this cue, that you are a part of 'us-versus-them,' it's almost like the whole brain becomes re-coordinated in how it views people," says Jay Van Bavel, the leader of NYU's Social Perception and Evaluation Lab.

	Our tendency toward partisanship is likely the result of evolution—forming groups is how prehistoric humans survived. That's helpful when trying to master an unforgiving environment with Stone Age technology. It's less so when trying to foster a functional democracy.

	...But to create the base "us and them" structure, none of that is needed. The brain is so hardwired to build such groups that Van Bavel says he can turn anyone on the street into a partisan. "I can do it in five minutes with a random stranger," he says. All it takes is a coin flip.

	"Somebody comes into your lab and you tell them, 'You're part of the blue team,' " he explains. "The next person who comes in, you flip a coin, let's say it comes up the other way. And you say, 'You're on the red team.' "

	That's it. The teammates never have to meet. Or interact. There doesn't need to be anything at stake. But within minutes, these insta-partisans like their teammates better than they like the other guys. And it shows when Van Bavel puts his subjects through his MRI dollhouse.

	Red-team members are more likely to see humans when they're told they're looking at fellow red-team faces. Blue-team members respond the same way. Other tests reveal that red-team members remember red-team faces more accurately, and if Van Bavel asks subjects to allocate money, red-team members will pay out more to their own. Team members also have less sympathy for those on the other side, and even experience pleasure while reading about their pain.

	...BUT WHEN IT COMES to American politics, how troubled should we be by any of these findings? America's partisan divide is as old as America's democracy. And it's neither feasible nor desirable to hope for a national consensus on every issue. Even if we all worked from the same set of facts, and even if we all understood those facts perfectly, differences of opinion would—and should—remain. Those opinions are not the problem. The trouble is when we're so blinded by our partisanship that it overrides reason—and research suggests that is happening all the time.

	With just a hint of partisan priming, an Arizona State University researcher was able to instantly blind Democrats to a noncontroversial fact, leading them immediately to fail to solve the easiest of math problems. In the 2010 experiment, political scientist Mark Ramirez asked subjects two similar questions. The control group saw this question: "Would you say that compared to 2008, the level of unemployment in this country has gotten better, stayed the same, or gotten worse?" A separate group saw this one: "Would you say that the level of unemployment in this country has gotten better, stayed the same, or gotten worse since Barack Obama was elected President?"

	The key difference between the two: the first mentions the time period for assessing unemployment, while the second frames the issue around President Obama. When asked the first question, Democrats and Republicans responded similarly, with most saying unemployment had remained about the same. But among subjects who got the second question, opinions shifted along partisan lines: Around 60 percent of Democrats said unemployment had gotten better or somewhat better, and about 75 percent of Republicans said the opposite.

	In fact, the unemployment rate increased between Obama's election and Ramirez's study. One can argue about whether this is a fair frame for evaluating this or any president's economic record, but from a raw-numbers perspective, the rise in the unemployment rate between 2008 and 2010 is indisputable.

	But even giving Democrats that information did not increase the accuracy of their responses. Ramirez's study asked some participants the following question: "The U.S. Bureau of Labor Statistics shows unemployment has increased by 4.6 percent since 2008. Would you say that the level of unemployment in this country has gotten better, stayed the same, or gotten worse since Barack Obama was elected President?"

	Clearly, the answer is in the sentence that immediately precedes the question. But the mention of Obama launched a partisan mental process that led many astray: Nearly 60 percent of Democrats said unemployment had lessened since Obama's election.

	Essentially, once Democrats focused on Obama, most of them largely ignored the facts. (About 80 percent of Republicans got the answer right when it was spoon-fed to them, but Republicans tempted to cry victory should be cautioned that researchers have found them to be similarly off base in assessing the economy when one of their own is in the Oval Office.)


(Also, if you read any of the hundreds of articles I'm making you read, read this one--it explains a lot.)


From what I can tell, the divisiveness of corrupt (or dishonest, evil) political leaders rests on two phenomena in the partisan psyche:

	1. Partisans have a hard time recognizing flaws in their own leaders
	2. Partisans impugn flaws of opposing leaders on the opposing party


This manifests especially during elections: 


https://pcl.stanford.edu/research/2012/iyengar-poq-affect-not-ideology.pdf
	Using data from a variety of sources, we demonstrate that both republicans and democrats increasingly dislike, even loathe, their opponents. We also find that partisan affect is inconsistently (and perhaps arti-factually) founded in policy attitudes. The more plausible account lies in the nature of political campaigns; exposure to messages attacking the out-group reinforces partisans’ biased views of their opponents.

	...Policy-based division is but one way of defining partisan polarization. An alternative, and in our view, more diagnostic, indicator of mass polarization is the extent to which partisans view each other as a disliked out-group. The definitional test of social identity (Tajfel 1970; Tajfel and Turner 1979) requires not only positive sentiment for one’s own group, but also negative sentiment toward those identifying with opposing groups. So, to the extent that party identification represents a meaningful group affiliation, the more appropriate test of polarization is affective, not ideological, identity.

	Affect based on partisan identity may reflect some combination of ideological disagreements and group-centric impulses. Partisans may attribute the more extreme policy positions of party elites and activists to party supporters, producing “principled” dislike. We present evidence that partisan affect is inconsistently related to policy preferences and that the relationship between partisan affect and policy attitudes hasn’t notably strengthened over time. The more plausible explanation, in our view, is that the mere act of identifying with a political party is sufficient to trigger negative evaluations of the opposition, and exposure to prolonged media-based campaigns only reinforces these predispositions. We present evidence showing that partisans’ feelings for their opponents become more negative following exposure to presidential campaigns.

	Our principal goal is to document the extent of affective polarization. We show that democrats and republicans not only increasingly dislike the opposing party, but also impute negative traits to the rank-and-file of the out-party. We further demonstrate that affective polarization has permeated judgments about interpersonal relations, exceeds polarization based on other prominent social cleavages, and that levels of partisan affect are significantly higher in America, compared to the United Kingdom. Finally, we present evidence suggesting that exposure to political campaigns is a potential contributory factor. Overall, the evidence is unequivocal: in terms of affect, Americans are polarized along party lines.

	...Between 1960 and 2008, stereotyping of partisan supporters and opponents increased exponentially. Among the Americans, in-party bias—the tendency to view one’s party more favorably than the opposition—climbed from 0.47 to 2.86!

	...In sum, the evidence presented above—the non-effects of sorting on the level of affective polarization, and the moderate to weak effects of policy preferences on net partisan affect—is at odds with the view that partisan affect is driven primarily by ideological affinity.

	...For parties to be seen in ideological terms would require an awareness of their policy stances, yet most Americans have difficulty correctly locating parties on issue scales


The general idea is: a partisan will see how awful the opposing party's candidate is and think "How can they support someone so awful? They must all be nuts!" At the same time, a partisan sees attacks on his candidate by the opposing party as disingenuous or hypocritical, making them easier to dismiss. Attacks by an out-party can actually make partisans like their candidate even more:


http://faculty2.ucmerced.edu/snicholson/Polarizing_Cues.pdf
	Lastly, I compare the effects of party labels (e.g., the Democratic Party) to party leaders (e.g., Barack Obama). The results indicate that partisans change their opinion to hold the opposite opinion of an out-party leader but that party labels, by themselves, largely do not have this effect. Based on these results, political figures, not party labels, appear to cause opinion polarization.


The effect is that corrupt candidates--and the negative campaigns that go with them--drastically increase the animosity (or "affective polarization" as Iyengar et. al. put it) between political parties.

There is some evidence that Russian propagandists tried to use the email scandal to increase this effect during the 2016 election:


http://www.newsweek.com/squalid-case-against-hillary-and-her-emails-492017
	The Squalid Case Against Hillary and Her Emails
	By John Dean 

	Endless efforts by congressional Republicans to foil or foul up Hillary Clinton’s run for the presidency have hit a new low.

	The members of Congress involved cannot be sued for defamation, since they are protected by the “Speech and Debate Clause” of the Constitution. But the fact that they are not merely smearing the former secretary of state but are trying to send her to jail on phony charges of perjury and lying to Congress is beyond the pale of dirty politics.

http://www.newsmax.com/Politics/john-dean-trump-inexperience-shows-needs/2017/05/15/id/790294/
	National Security Adviser H.R. McMaster's denial didn't really hit all the points of what Monday's Washington Post story alleged, Dean noted, sparking speculation from critics that it was essentially a non-denial denial.

	"It is conspicuous," he said. "It's very obvious they are not banging away at the story itself. They are playing around it. I don't know if they think this will get confused in translation or what's going to happen. It's not a very strong defense even."


http://www.newsweek.com/hillary-emails-republicans-revel-another-fake-scandal-478575
	Hillary Clinton’s Emails: Republicans Revel in Another Fake Scandal
	By Neil H. Buchanan

	...Comey has already gone outside of his portfolio and given Republicans some talking points that they will surely enjoy repeating. Even though the bottom line of his comments is, "There are a bunch of things here that bother me, but this was not a close call," Comey did give Republicans some political sustenance.  

	For Republicans, however, that is never enough.  They will overplay this, as they always do.

http://www.dorfonlaw.org/2017/05/time-for-careful-lying-by-team-trump.html
	 Time for Careful Lying by Team Trump
	by Neil H. Buchanan

	...after The Washington Post's blockbuster May 15 scoop that Trump had revealed highly classified information to two top officials of the Russian government, the Administration sent out Trump's national security advisor, H.R. McMaster, to do some careful lying.


http://www.motherjones.com/kevin-drum/2016/12/timid-liberals-flinching-hillary-clintons-email-server/
	Timid Liberals Blew the Election by Flinching at Hillary Clinton’s Email Server

	Kevin Drum

	So here’s what we’ve got. Clinton used a private server for her unclassified emails. However, that doesn’t provide any reason to think she was any more careless about discussing classified information than any other secretary of state. Nevertheless, Republicans used the excuse of the Benghazi investigation to demand an inspector general’s audit of her emails. The intelligence community, naturally, concluded that Clinton’s archives contained thousands of discussions of classified programs. They would most likely conclude the same thing if they audited the email account of any ranking State Department official. It’s just a fact of life that State and CIA disagree about this stuff.

http://washingtonmonthly.com/2005/09/18/final-entry/
	Final entry

	by Leon Fuerth

	This is my final post here. Many thanks to Kevin Drum 


http://www.newsmax.com/Politics/rush-limbaugh-hillary-clinton-security-risk/2016/06/28/id/736151/
	Rush: Hillary a National Security Risk and Dem Voters Don't Care

	The presumptive Democratic presidential nominee is a national security risk, and half of the country doesn't care, conservative radio talk show host Rush Limbaugh said on Tuesday.


http://www.breitbart.com/2016-presidential-race/2016/07/25/democrats-suddenly-very-concerned-about-email-hacking/
	Democrats Suddenly Very Concerned About Email Hacking

	After spending a year downplaying the risk of Hillary Clinton’s highly vulnerable email server getting hacked — and exposing the classified documents it wasn’t supposed to contain — to foreign intelligence services, Democrats are suddenly very concerned about email hacking. That’s because they desperately need to discredit the devastating leak of DNC emails as a Russian dirty trick to rig the U.S. election.


And spreading "disunity" and "dispute" and "divide and conquer" strategies are something the Okhrana is known for:


https://books.google.com/books?id=h3By77UU4nIC&pg=PA1&source=gbs_toc_r&cad=3#v=onepage&q&f=false
	The Okhrana developed the tradition of using not just informers (osvedomiteli), but also active agents (predateli or 'traitors') within opposition groups. Georgii Sudeikin, the head of the Special Section of the Police Department in the 1880s (himself assassinated in 1883), defined the role of Russian agents extremely broadly. As well as collecting information, they should 'generate suspicion and demoralization, thereby greatly retarding possible revolutionary activity', attempt the 'cultivation of quarrels and clashes amongst the revolutionary groups, the spreading of false rumours to intimidate the revolutionaries and instill a fear of betrayal and espionage


http://uselessdissident.blogspot.com/2008/12/love-letter-to-america-part-two.html
	500 years before Christ, the Chinese military strategist Sun Tzu formulated the principle of subversion this way:

    1. Cover with ridicule all of the valid traditions in your opponent's country.
    2. Implicate their leaders in criminal affairs and turn them over to the scorn of their populace at the right time;
    3. Disrupt the work of their government by every means;
    4. Do not shun the aid of the lowest and most despicable individuals of your enemy's country.
    5. Spread disunity and dispute among the citizens.
    6. Turn the young against the old.
    7. Be generous with promises and rewards to collaborators and accomplices.

	...these “rules” are almost a literal interpretation of those “theories and practices” which I learned from my KGB superiors and colleagues within the 'Novosti' Press Agency.

(Supposedly Sun Tzu is required reading for the KGB, if you can find the source for that)


https://books.google.com/books?id=h3By77UU4nIC&pg=PA151
	'Active measures' (aktivnye meropriiatia) against any opposition or would-be opposition are a key part of the new governing formula. Over and above the use of black PR and kompromat (see pages 70-1), or the cruder types of administration resources (legal deregistration, etc.), active measures proper involves the deployment of virtual objects or events created or staged by political technologists to weaken the opposition.

	...political technologists can seek to alter the entire dynamic of the political system to work against the opposition, most often via artificial polarisation or so-called 'strategies of tension'.

	...Marat Gelman is right to say that many political tactics characteristic of the post-Soviet states are as old as the hills. The most obvious active measure is the traditional game of divide and rule.


https://cepa.ecms.pl/files/?id_plik=2715
	If there is one common thread in the Kremlin’s many narratives it is the use of conspiratorial discourse and a strategic use of disinformation to trash the information space, break trust, increase polarization and undermine the public space for democratic debate


If dividing the country in the 2016 election was Russia's goal, it worked. It's often missed that the 2016 election itself was a kind of psychological warfare against the American public:


https://www.usatoday.com/story/news/politics/onpolitics/2016/08/31/poll-clinton-trump-most-unfavorable-candidates-ever/89644296/
	Poll: Clinton, Trump most unfavorable candidates ever

	Donald Trump and Hillary Clinton are the two most unpopular presidential candidates in more than 30 years of ABC News/Washington Post polling.


http://www.politico.com/story/2016/05/poll-hillary-clinton-trump-voters-dislike-223504
	Poll: 6 in 10 dislike or hate Trump and Clinton


https://www.theatlantic.com/international/archive/2016/11/trump-election-foreign-policy/505934/
	Thomas Wright: Firstly, I’m not saying that Trump is equivalent to Nazis in Germany—to their rise. But since those elections, I think there’s never been an election where so much is riding on how a major power would behave in the world. What’s unique about this election is that Trump has a very, very different notion of American foreign policy and [America’s] global role, and would dramatically change U.S. foreign policy if he was elected. Since the world is essentially organized around American power and American intentions, that would have an enormously disruptive effect...

	...To some degree it’s about his views on authoritarianism. But also his first view reinforces his third view: He’s already of the view that the U.S. shouldn’t really be in NATO or in Europe, helping Europe defend itself from Russia. 

	...We underestimate just how much he’s committed to this. He’s been voluntarily speaking about this for three decades. Everyone accuses him of not studying, and that is true. But in this very narrow way, when he says he listens to himself [for foreign-policy advice]...

	Friedman: Do you think the president of the United States has the power to undo that order single-handedly? ...

	Wright: I think the answer, unfortunately, is yes

	...what would probably happen is that the world would become much more dangerous in terms of other countries coming close to conflict with each other

	...I [also] think the global economy would take a huge dive. There would probably be a very severe recession because the U.S. would not be guaranteeing the openness of the global economy. Trump’s position basically is: For the U.S. economy to do well, other countries must do worse.


https://www.washingtonpost.com/news/the-fix/wp/2016/07/29/clinton-and-trump-accept-their-nominations-by-telling-you-what-you-should-vote-against/
	Welcome to the next, most negative presidential election of our lives

	Hillary Clinton is the first female nominee of a major American political party, and she would love for you to vote for the first female president.

	But she's okay if you just want to vote against Donald Trump.


https://www.nytimes.com/2016/10/16/magazine/hillary-clinton-campaign-final-weeks.html
	Clinton told me. “I’m trying to run a campaign that presents an alternative case.” It’s telling that a candidate with the name recognition, résumé and baggage of Hillary Clinton is nonetheless left to present her campaign as an “alternative case.”

	...As I was leaving our interview, she smiled, looked me in the eyes and left me with a casual reminder. “As I’ve told people,” she said, “I’m the last thing standing between you and the apocalypse.”


https://www.usnews.com/news/articles/2016-07-01/13-percent-of-people-prefer-a-giant-meteor-crashing-to-earth-over-a-trump-or-clinton-presidency
	13 Percent of People Would Rather Have a Meteor Hit Earth Than Elect Trump or Clinton

	How much do some people hate the idea of a President Hillary Clinton or Donald Trump?

	Apparently enough that they'd rather die in an apocalyptic event than see it become a reality.

	According to the latest survey by the left-leaning Public Policy Polling, 13 percent of people would rather have a giant meteor hit Earth than elect Clinton or Trump.

	The exact question: "If the choices for President were Democrat Hillary Clinton, Republican Donald Trump, and a Giant Meteor hitting the earth which would you choose?"

	About 43 percent opted for Clinton, 38 percent for Trump, 13 percent for the giant meteor, and 7 percent were unsure.


http://abcnews.go.com/Politics/full-transcript-abcs-david-muir-interviews-hillary-clinton/story?id=33607656
	DAVID MUIR: Here we sit, five months into your campaign and there are some eye-opening poll numbers out there, and I'm sure you're aware of them, when it comes to how Americans see you. Our ABC poll, Gallup, Quinnipiac showing your favorability numbers taking a sharp dive.

	In one poll, the lowest ever. And when voters were asked, "What is the first word that comes to mind when you think of Hillary Clinton?" Words like liar, dishonest, untrustworthy were at the top of the list. Does this tell you that your original explanation about the private server, that you did it to carry one phone out of convenience, that this didn't sit well with the American people?

	HILLARY CLINTON: Well, David, obviously, I don't like hearing that...

	DAVID MUIR: ...Americans have watched you as First Lady, they watched you run for Senate, they watched you run for president the first time. You served as Secretary of State. And now you're running for president a second time. And I, I wanna know in your most private of moments, is there ever an instance when you ask yourself, "Why am I doing this again?"

	HILLARY CLINTON: ...young mother stands up with her four-and-a-half-month old baby in her arms

	...issues that I have fought for my entire adult life

	...people have told me all my life about the difficulties they encounter just trying to raise a family. Just trying to make it in America again. So it's hard but--


http://www.reuters.com/article/us-usa-election-meteor-idUSKCN12I20S
	Some 53 percent of the 1,247 people aged 18 to 35 said they would prefer to see a meteor destroy the world than have Republican New York real estate developer Trump in the Oval Office, with some 34 percent preferring planetary annihilation to seeing the Democratic former Secretary of State win.

	Some 39 percent said they would prefer that U.S. President Barack Obama declare himself president for life than hand over power to Clinton or Trump, with 26 percent saying the nation would do better to select its next leader in a random lottery.

	Some 23 percent, nearly one in four, preferred the giant meteor outcome to either Trump or Clinton.


http://abcnews.go.com/Politics/full-transcript-abcs-david-muir-interviews-hillary-clinton/story?id=33607656
	DAVID MUIR: So you do wake-up--

	HILLARY CLINTON: --it's absolutely worth it.

	DAVID MUIR: --you wake-up like the rest of us every once in a while and think--

	HILLARY CLINTON: Yeah, it's hard.

	DAVID MUIR: --"Am I really doing this again?"

	HILLARY CLINTON: Well, yeah, of course. You know, I, I never, you know, I...


https://pcl.stanford.edu/research/2012/iyengar-poq-affect-not-ideology.pdf
	...presidential campaigns have since become more antagonistic and harder to ignore.

	...On Fox news and, more recently, MSNBC, partisans encounter news and commentary on the campaign that only confirms their stereotypes of the out-group. 

	...our analyses suggest that greater levels of negativity in advertising campaigns and general exposure to political campaigns both contribute to higher levels of affective polarization. Campaigns reinforce voters’ sense of partisan identity and confirm stereotypical beliefs about supporters and opponents 


https://newrepublic.com/article/135148/trump-made-america-racist-republicans-ok-that
	Trump Has Made America More Racist. Republicans Are OK With That.

	...Trump has already awakened and sanctioned a kind of latent social disorder among his supporters, many of whom harbored racist sentiments silently or privately


http://time.com/4486502/hillary-clinton-basket-of-deplorables-transcript/
	[HILL-A-RY chants]

	I know there are only 60 days left to make our case -- and don't get complacent, don't see the latest outrageous, offensive, inappropriate comment and think well he's done this time. We are living in a volatile political environment. You know, to just be grossly generalistic, you could put half of Trump's supporters into what I call the basket of deplorables. Right?

	[Laughter/applause]

	The racist, sexist, homophobic, xenophobic, Islamaphobic -- you name it.


http://www.breitbart.com/big-government/2016/08/01/the-emerging-trumpian-majority/
	The Emerging Trumpian Majority

	Populists vs. Elitists

	...Meanwhile, under Hillary Clinton, the Democrats are now the elitist establishment party.

	...For their part, the Democrats haven’t changed much.  The big change is that they are trying to hide their true selves, and they are using big money to help them do the hiding.

	However, if we take a close look, we can see that the Democratic Party is as devoted to its pet causes as ever, including quotas of all kinds and fawning treatment for street radicalism.

	...So the Democrats, being bought and paid for, can’t help but appear smug and oblivious.


http://thefederalist.com/2016/10/31/liberals-dont-care-about-the-health-of-democracy-they-care-about-hillary/
	 Democrats Don’t Care About The Health Of Democracy, They Care About Hillary

	When liberals claim Comey is endangering democracy, they mean he’s endangering Hillary -- which to them is the same thing. 


http://www.pbs.org/wgbh/frontline/article/america-in-2016-partisan-fearful-and-angry/
	America in 2016: Partisan, Fearful and Angry

	As Republicans and Democrats begin gathering this week for their national conventions, the partisan divide between both parties is the widest it’s been in at least a quarter century.

	...But voters aren’t just frustrated with members of the opposing side. They’re also fearful of them. More than half of Democrats say the GOP makes them “afraid,” while 49 percent of Republicans say the same about Democrats. Nearly half of all Republicans say Democrats make them feel angry, and vice versa.

	In many cases, the study notes, “negative feelings about the opposing party are as powerful — and in many cases more powerful — as are positive feelings about one’s own party.”


http://www.economist.com/news/leaders/21702188-donald-trumps-nomination-cleveland-will-put-thriving-country-risk-great
	The dividing of America

	...This nation is going to hell


http://www.businessinsider.com/november-new-yorker-cover-captures-americas-election-despair-2016-11
	The cover of The New Yorker's November 14th issue sums up how a lot of Americans will likely feel after Tuesday's election: anguish.

	The cover depicts a New York City subway rider reading a newspaper splashed with the headlines, 'Oh, sweet Jesus please god, no," "Anything but that," and, "Come on."

	...Time Magazine's latest cover shows both candidates smiling and holding a sign reading, "The end is near."


http://www.apa.org/news/press/releases/2016/10/presidential-election-stress.aspx
	APA Survey Reveals 2016 Presidential Election Source of Significant Stress for More Than Half of Americans

	...APA offers the following tips to help people manage their stress related to the election:

	- If the 24-hour news cycle of claims and counterclaims from the candidates is causing you stress, limit your media consumption. Read just enough to stay informed. Turn off the newsfeed or take a digital break. Take some time for yourself, go for a walk, or spend time with friends and family doing things that you enjoy.

	- Avoid getting into discussions about the election if you think they have the potential to escalate to conflict. Be cognizant of the frequency with which you’re discussing the election with friends, family members or coworkers.


https://www.bloomberg.com/news/articles/2016-11-04/this-election-will-end-the-mental-damage-may-not
	This Election Will End. The Mental Damage May Not

	...The “election cycle has unleashed negativity and somehow given license to be mean and hateful. It has left deep scars on our society”


https://www.washingtonpost.com/news/dr-gridlock/wp/2017/02/12/a-united-pilot-ranted-about-trump-clinton-and-divorce-her-passengers-fled/
	Dozens of passengers fled a plane and police removed their United Airlines pilot after she gave a long, bizarre speech before takeoff on Saturday.

	...The pilot touched on recent politics.


http://sanfrancisco.cbslocal.com/2017/02/11/emotional-pilot-removed-from-sfo-bound-flight-after-bizarre-rant/
	“She started off by saying that she had not voted for either Trump or Clinton because they’re a bunch of liars,” said passenger Noel Portugal. “That’s an odd way to start of the welcome to your flight. It really sort of went downhill from there and didn’t make a lot of sense to any of us.”


https://www.washingtonpost.com/news/dr-gridlock/wp/2017/02/12/a-united-pilot-ranted-about-trump-clinton-and-divorce-her-passengers-fled/
	“She’s like ‘I don’t care if you voted for Trump or Clinton. They’re both [expletive],” Reiss wrote.

	When she changed the subject to the plane’s imminent takeoff, Reiss began to shake, and another passenger began videotaping the drama.

	“So I’ll stop, and we’ll fly the airplane,” the pilot said in the video, which has since been removed from YouTube. “Don’t worry. I’m going to let my co-pilot fly it. He’s a man.”

	...He heard one flier yell “Stop!” at the pilot. Others were crying as they streamed back to the terminal.

	...“People were pleading … ‘Please call security,'”

	...Before he re-boarded, Reiss said, he watched police walk the pilot back through the airport.

	The pilot apologized and hugged him before they parted, he said.

	She offered to write a book with him.

	It looked to him as if she’d been crying, too.


http://abcnews.go.com/Politics/full-transcript-abcs-david-muir-interviews-hillary-clinton/story?id=33607656
	DAVID MUIR: Are you having fun?

	HILLARY CLINTON: I am. It's hard but it's fun. Most of the things that are hard in life are fun. And, you know, one of my great favorite lines from A League of Their Own when Tom Hanks, playing the broken down drunken coach, you know, confronts you know, the player that, you know...


Apparently, the psychological warfare that is the 2016 election is powerful enough to bring down airplanes.

Why would the Russians want this, besides to make us miserable? One likely reason is to make the Government more dysfunctional (e.g. Gingrich's idea that the minority party should make Congress fail to win the next election)--the more Congress is fighting with each other, the less they get done (and the more likely they harm the country, e.g. with the recent removal of the filibuster for Supreme Court nominees). Political animosity among the public could also give Russian spies in Congress cover to act in more harmful or divisive ways ("I was just doing what my constituents wanted!").

As a general rule, in any divide and conquer strategy you want your opponent to be fighting themselves instead of fighting you. Divide and conquer is, paradoxically, a method of waging conflict based on the idea that conflict is wasteful.

For the Russians, political polarization specifically (which has been rising significantly for the past several decades http://www.people-press.org/2016/06/22/partisanship-and-political-animosity-in-2016/) has the added benefit of literally making Americans dumber, as explained above. Polarization clobbers partisans ability to reason objectively about politicized issues (partisan motivated reasoning), and more and more issues are becoming politicized. Researchers have been trying to tackle political polarization in America with limited success:


http://www.theatlantic.com/politics/archive/2014/09/how-politics-breaks-our-brains-and-how-we-can-put-them-back-together/453315/
	A MONTH OF SPEAKING TO scientists about the political brain produced no shortage of depressing conclusions. Their research reveals our brains to be frustratingly inept at rational, objective political discourse. And those revelations come at a time when elected officials have strong incentives to stay the partisan course, and when the people who elect those officials are increasingly getting their political news through sources pre-tailored to reinforce their opinions.

	But the research is more than just another explanation for our current partisan morass. On balance, it offers a better case for optimism—about Congress, about voters, about your outspoken extremist uncle at Thanksgiving, and about the power of reason in democracy. Because the research is also revealing that our brains, while imperfect, are surprisingly flexible, and that they can be nudged in a better direction. Yes, we wall ourselves off from unappealing truths. But when motivated—by money, by the right environment, by an affirmed sense of self, by institutions that value truth and civility—those walls come down.


As far as the human brain is flexible, values and standards can mitigate the effects of polarization. But this can also go the other way--traumatic events like the 2016 election can rewire partisans brains to hate each other enough that standards get thrown out the window. This seems to be something the Russians are gunning for:


http://www.propornot.com/p/the-list.html
	...infowars.com ... zerohedge.com ... naturalnews.com...


https://www.infowars.com/america-on-the-brink-of-bloody-civil-war/
	America On The Brink Of Bloody Civil War
	Tensions in the U.S. are higher than ever

	Alex Jones breaks down the deep state’s strategy in creating civil unrest in America to usher in a time of chaos to which the only solution presented will be total communism.


http://www.zerohedge.com/news/2017-04-21/simple-reason-why-second-american-civil-war-may-be-inevitable
	The Simple Reason Why A Second American Civil War May Be Inevitable

	...You can feel it in the air. Our nation has clearly never been this divided since the Civil War. A lot of people noticed it after the last election, but the truth is that these divisions have been deepening for decades, and they’re just now reaching a very noticeable breaking point. 

	...One Trump supporter admitted to being surrounded, pepper sprayed, and beaten with sticks by a mob of “protesters.”

	But wait, that’s not the dark part. After these groups clashed, the leftist protesters took to Reddit and admitted that they lost this particular battle (I can’t believe I’m using the word “battle” to describe it), and that it was time for them to attain more combat training and better weapons, including firearms.


http://www.naturalnews.com/055146_social_chaos_election_results_popular_revolt.html
	Chaos will erupt across America in less than 100 days... no matter who wins the election

	As I've publicly predicted numerous times over the last year, if Donald Trump wins, the radical extreme leftists go on a violent rampage that leads to the rest of us begging for martial law. After half a dozen cities burn with riots and looting, Trump invokes a national emergency, deploying National Guard troops across the most devastated urban areas, and the radical left finds itself in a shooting war with the government.

	If Hillary Clinton wins, all the Trump supporters who have been violently assaulted, spat upon and physically attacked by the radical left un-holster their concealed weapons and start shooting back. This quickly escalates into open warfare between lunatic leftist Hillary supporters and armed Trump "Second Amendment" people who basically figure they've got nothing left to lose anyway, so why not fight to save America?

	...Hundreds of millions of guns across America are now in the hands of people who are fed up with being stomped on, ridiculed and marginalized by a corrupt leftist regime that's destroying America

	...What the author is saying is, essentially, America is quite likely just 70 days away from the start of the next revolution... or even events that could escalate into Civil War.

	...A Hillary victory would set off an immediate popular revolt

	If Hillary wins the election, it's hard not to imagine some sort of popular revolt across America as the citizens reject the obvious criminality and corruption of not just the Clinton crime family but also a complicit mainstream media. The same media that has funneled millions of dollars into the Clinton Foundation also intentionally downplays all the Clinton scandals. The entire system is a corrupt, incestuous, rigged f--kfest that benefits the deceitful plutocrats whom the voters are sick and tired of seeing remain in power.

	...If Trump wins, the globalist banksters crash the debt bubble to unleash mass chaos

	...Once the globalists declare open warfare against the Trump administration, all bets are off and anything could unfold over the next few years. Expect things to get very nasty, very desperate and incredibly violent. Life as you know it in America is about to be disrupted in a serious way.

	By the way, I also predict that Edward Snowden, Julian Assange and Anonymous will all play key roles in these unfolding events, exposing mind-blowing government secrets that spur populations across many western nations into escalating their action against the corrupt government regimes they've foolishly allowed to rule over them. Much of the real war taking place across our globe right now is a cyber war... a "war of secrets" where the hackers and cyber activists are increasingly exposing all the corruption and criminality of governments, which maintain their power by constantly lying to the public and withholding the truth.

	...Even if Clinton does win the election and occupy the White House, the global end game is fast approaching anyway. A Clinton White House only further encourages the calls for revolt across the population, and Hillary's deep corruption and criminality is so despised by nearly all soldiers and police officers that it's hard to imagine her being able to demand respect from either of those groups. In fact, it's a lot easier to imagine a military coup against President Clinton that it is to imagine a successful eradication of the Second Amendment by her presidency. Even if Clinton ordered police across America to go door to door and confiscate all the firearms of private citizens, what cop would be stupid enough to even attempt such a suicide mission?

	I can't overstate this point: Things are at a breaking point in America, and the only thing holding back a mass revolt right now is the looming election, which presents at least a glimmer of hope to the people of America that they might beat back tyranny and government oppression with a Trump victory.

	...What Washington elites utterly fail to realize is that for many Americans, they have nothing else left to lose if they lose this election. They've already lost their job and their health coverage. In many places across America, they're losing their own national flag and national pride. They've been ridiculed, condemned and spat upon by the dishonest media and the crybully leftist f--ktards, and they realize full well that if they don't draw a line in the sand right here, right now, they're going to be disarmed, enslaved, impoverished and named "enemies of the state" in the very same country they once fought for (and pledged allegiance to).

	The psyche of real America has reached its last straw. With the culture under attack, the Constitution demonized, religious beliefs targeted for merciless condemnation and the industrial base of America utterly gutted beyond restoration, there is nothing left to surrender to the demands of the tyrannical left. It is at that breaking point where, in the minds of many citizens throughout history, they pick up pitch forks and march en masse against the oppressors in power.

	We are very, very close to that day in America. It may, in fact, unravel in just the next 100 days. No matter who wins this election, mass violence breaks out across America in one way or another.


Supposedly, something like this has worked before:


http://www.kansascity.com/opinion/article136721193.html
	How did the plantation owners mislead so many Southern whites?

	They managed this con job partly with a propaganda technique that will be familiar to modern Americans, but hasn’t received the coverage it deserves in our sesquicentennial celebrations. Starting in the 1840s wealthy Southerners supported more than 30 regional pro-slavery magazines, many pamphlets, newspapers and novels that falsely touted slave ownership as having benefits that would – in today’s lingo – trickle down to benefit non-slave owning whites and even blacks. The flip side of the coin of this old-is-new trickle-down propaganda is the mistaken notion that any gain by blacks in wages, schools or health care comes at the expense of the white working class.


https://www.civilwar.org/learn/articles/why-non-slaveholding-southerners-fought
	...Southerners heard the identical message from their community leaders.  In the fall of 1860, John Townsend, owner of a cotton plantation on Edisto Island, authored a pamphlet delineating the consequences of Lincoln’s elevation to presidency.

	...Non-slaveholders, he predicted, were also in danger.  “It will be to the non-slaveholder, equally with the largest slaveholder, the obliteration of caste and the deprivation of important privileges,” he cautioned.  “The color of the white man is now, in the South, a title of nobility in his relations as to the negro,” he reminded his readers.


http://www.independent.co.uk/news/science/archaeology/historians-reveal-secrets-of-uk-gun-running-which-lengthened-the-american-civil-war-by-two-years-9557937.html
	Other research, carried out over the past decade, has revealed the extraordinary extent to which substantial sections of Britain’s business elite were working with impunity to help the slave-owning southern states win the Civil War – despite the fact that Britain was officially neutral and had outlawed slavery almost 30 years earlier.

	...The entirely illegal, but tacitly British-Government-approved pro-Confederate gun-running operation is thought to have lengthened the American Civil War by up to two years – and to have therefore cost as many as 400,000 American lives.

	...Researcher Gerald Hayes is piecing together the previously unstudied details of a complex of more than half a dozen blockade-busting companies based in Liverpool and London and their relationship with other Confederate sympathizers – including pro-Confederacy MPs at Westminster.

	Britain was split down the middle in its attitude to the American Civil War. The left, many liberals and much of the working class was pro-US and anti-Confederate – mainly because of the South’s pro-slavery stance. But many Tories and much of the business sector were actively pro-Confederate, as there were considerable fortunes to be made from supplying guns, uniforms, medicines, textiles and even food to the south.

	Geopolitically, the British government saw the USA as a growing challenge to its global domination – especially in terms of merchant marine carrying capacity. The British also feared US expansionism and potential US-originating threats to Canada and British colonies in the Caribbean.

	“Economically Britain saw huge advantages in the break-up of the United States. It saw the American South as a source of raw cotton – and as a market for manufacturing goods, whereas it saw the North as an industrial competitor which sought to use protectionist policies to exclude Britain from American markets,” said Dr. Graham.


(also, FWIW for U.S. - British relations: all that Britons that did that are now dead)


Partisan animosity has another key benefit for the Okhrana--thanks to partisan motivated reasoning, the more Republicans and Democrats hate each other, the easier it is for the Okhrana to blame their activities on America's partisans. If the Okhrana can get Republicans and Democrats to hate each other enough, Democrats will *want* to believe Republicans are out to destroy America, and vice versa:


http://www.propornot.com/p/the-list.html
	...infowars.com ... ronpaulinstitute.org ... russia-insider.com...


https://www.infowars.com/video-liberal-plan-to-destroy-america-revealed/
	Video: Liberal Plan To Destroy America Revealed

	Globalists plan to destabilize world by flooding Europe and US with illegal immigrants...


https://www.bloomberg.com/view/articles/2016-03-24/how-russia-is-weaponizing-migration-to-destabilize-europe
	How Russia Is 'Weaponizing' Migration to Destabilize Europe


http://www.ronpaulinstitute.org/archives/peace-and-prosperity/2017/june/15/there-will-be-blood-the-alexandria-shooting-and-civil-war-in-america/
	There Will be Blood: The Alexandria Shooting and Civil War in America

	The shooting at a Republican baseball practice in Virginia shouldn’t come as a surprise. It’s the result of months of establishment agitprop. From Kathy Griffin posing with Trump’s severed head to a Trump-like Julius Caesar killed in Central Park play, the media has fixated on strife between the two establishment parties.

	This isn’t an accident. It’s designed to keep Americans distracted and at each other’s throats as the economy slowly implodes and the wars expand with horrific toll.

	The election of Trump provides a unique opportunity to create partisan battle lines. Social media is rife with venom and hatred as the alt-left faces off against the alt-right. Factions are established and receive support behind the scenes from George Soros, the Koch Brothers, and the Democrat “resistance,” a ludicrous moniker cooked up by the Democratic National Committee under its new chairman Tom Perez. The DNC announced it will throw a million dollars at its Summer of Resistance. This will further widen the political divide. Polarization is increasingly intense and the establishment propaganda media is fanning the flames.

	...We’re in the early stages of an engineered civil war. Who benefits from this? The state.


https://www.infowars.com/trump-is-right-heres-proof-hillary-obama-founded-isis/
	Trump Is Right: Here’s Proof Hillary & Obama Founded ISIS
	Hillary even admitted U.S. created al-Qaeda, the precursor of ISIS


http://www.foxnews.com/opinion/2013/07/09/ex-soviet-bloc-`spy-chief-explains-hidden-origin-todays-jihad.html
	By 1972, Andropov's disinformation machinery was working around the clock to persuade the Islamic world that the U.S. intended to transform the rest of the world into a Zionist fiefdom. He wanted us to convince Muslims that the U.S. Congress was a "Council of the Elders of Zion" which conspired to have the Jews take over the world. If we whipped up Muslim anti-Semitism, then terrorism and violence against Israel and America would naturally follow.

	Thus, the Romanian DIE (counterpart of KGB foreign intelligence), which I headed, in 1972 received from the KGB an Arabic translation of the old Russian forgery, “The Protocols of the Elders of Zion.” We also received "documentary" material in Arabic produced by the Soviet disinformation "proving" America was a Zionist country whose aim was to transform the Islamic world into a Jewish fief. 

	My DIE was ordered to disseminate these documents within its targeted Islamic countries. During my later years in Romania, the DIE disseminated thousands of copies of “The Protocols” and similar “documents” each month.

	...What is the lesson here for us? We can win the current War on Terror only by detoxing the Islamic world of its anti-Americanism. When I worked for the Soviet bloc disinformation machine, I helped foment that toxin.


http://www.nytimes.com/2002/10/26/world/anti-semitic-elders-of-zion-gets-new-life-on-egypt-tv.html
	Anti-Semitic 'Elders of Zion' Gets New Life on Egypt TV

	The ''Protocols,'' which purports to depict Jewish leaders plotting world dominion, has long been recognized as a fabrication by the czarist secret police. It was used in early 20th-century Russia and in Nazi Germany as a pretext for persecution of Jews. Still, the show's backers say they are keeping an open mind about its authenticity. They say that in any event, reality seems to bear them out, in that Israel controls part of the Middle East.

	''In a way, don't they dominate?'' said Hala Sarhan, Dream TV's vice president and feisty personality on the air. ''Of course, what we read from the 'Protocols,' it says it's a kind of conspiracy. They want to control; they want to dominate. I represent everybody in the street. We will see whether this happened throughout history or not.''

	Ms. Sarhan is quick to point out that the material about the ''Protocols'' is only one aspect of a sweeping television panorama. But others who have seen the entire program say that a Zionist conspiracy to control Arab lands is one of the themes running through the series.

	At one point, men in the Arab anti-British resistance movement find the ''Protocols'' and have it translated, said a co-writer, Muhammad Baghdadi. ''They discovered that many things in this document were happening in reality,'' Mr. Baghdadi said, ''whether they were written by the Jews or not.''


http://www.terrorism-info.org.il/en/article/454
	The Syrian régime, both the former, controlled by the late president Hafiz al-Assad and the current, controlled by his son Bashar, is infected with anti-Semitism. The comments made by Bashar, the anti-Semitic bias of the Syrian media (including the production of anti-Semitic TV shows such as The Exile1) and the publication of anti-Semitic books (including the new edition of The Protocols of the Elders of Zion) have all given witness to it.

	A new edition of The Protocols was published early in 2005 and, as noted by the publisher, authorized by the Syrian Ministry of Information in May 2004. It is marketed through DarAl-Awael’s Internet site, as are other anti-Semitic books. 

	The roots of The Protocols of the Elders of Zion lie in classic, Christian European anti-Semitism; however, the introduction to the Syrian edition also supports its libels with Islamic sources, and the result is a fusion of European and Islamic motifs. Not merely a reissuing of the familiar Protocols, it has been prefaced with an introduction and chapters dealing with current political issues, combining anti-Semitic myths of Jewish world domination, theories of Jewish influence on world politics and on American policy, encouragement of Palestinian terrorism and blatant anti-American and anti-Israeli incitement. 


http://dailysignal.com/2015/07/24/why-are-russian-hackers-posing-as-isis-propagandists/
	Why Are Russian Hackers Posing as ISIS Propagandists?


https://www.counterpunch.org/2017/06/22/sorry-but-its-entirely-the-rights-fault/
	Sorry, But It’s Entirely the Right’s Fault

	Many commentators are suggesting that both right and left are equally to blame for all the polarization between them. They’re wrong. The reason for all the bitterness between left and right is entirely the right’s fault. Right-wingers who suggest otherwise are self-deluded – and usually projecting.

	Exhibit A: Newt Gingrich.


http://www.newsweek.com/american-who-dared-make-putins-case-231388
	The American Who Dared Make Putin’s Case
	By Zoë Schlanger On 3/10/14 at 6:35 PM 

	An academic with generally progressive beliefs married to Katrina vanden Heuvel, editor-in-chief of the left-leaning Nation, he has a view of events in Ukraine that urges Americans to understand Putin’s point of view.

	In his article “Distorting Russia,” Cohen wrote that American “demonization” of Putin in news coverage amounts to “toxic” “media malpractice” that verges on the alarmist language of the Cold War.

	...But while their opinions have gone largely unremarked, Cohen has been widely derided as a Putin apologist. Yet former House Speaker Newt Gingrich, of all people, has backed him up.

	Cohen says he is the real American patriot and those who are pressing President Barack Obama and the European Union to counter the Russians in Crimea are a danger to our national security.


http://transcripts.cnn.com/TRANSCRIPTS/1403/03/sitroom.01.html
	COHEN: Well, you know, Reagan says it -- said it took two to tango, and that's absolutely true. I'm pushing back against the American narrative.

	The long story is -- and I'll give it to you short -- in the 1990s, President Clinton decided to begin to expand NATO toward Russia. Russia is now on NATO's borders. That's a military alliance.

	To make the short story in the foreground, in November, when this current crisis in Ukraine began, Putin said to Washington and to Brussels, to the European Union, why are you forcing Ukraine to choose between Russia and the west? Why don't we do a joint economic aid to Ukraine? And our answer was, "No, it's either/or. It's our way or the highway." And now you are where you are. 

	BLITZER: Let's let the former speaker, Newt Gingrich, respond. Go ahead.

	NEWT GINGRICH, CO-HOST, "CROSSFIRE": There's a lot to what he just said.

	BLITZER: A lot of accuracy?

	GINGRICH: A lot of accuracy. The United States and Europeans have been trying to pull Ukraine away from Russia at a time when half their natural gas and oil comes from Russia. They're deeply in debt to the Russians. Crimea is, in fact, a Russian naval base. It was a Soviet Union base. It goes back 300 years as Russian territory. And I think Putin sent a lot of signals that he was going to do something sooner or later.

	I worry about this both in terms of Crimea and what happens to Ukraine but also in terms of what lessons does he learn about dealing with Estonia, Latvia and Lithuania, who are members of NATO and are on the northern Russian flank? It's very important that Putin understands there are consequences to this kind of aggressiveness, but I do think that the United States and Europe did a lot to set up the crisis. 


http://www.nytimes.com/1996/01/21/weekinreview/seeing-green-the-red-menace-is-gone-but-here-s-islam.html
	In the absence of other compelling threats to the United States, Islamic radicalism has also seized the imagination of some in Congress. House Speaker Newt Gingrich, who has warned about "totalitarian Islam," led Congress last month to approve $20 million in covert aid to moderate Iran's behavior. No matter that there is no viable opposition to Iran's Government; that the Central Intelligence Agency has concluded that despite severe economic problems the regime is not going to collapse any time soon, and that the policy is likely only to fuel paranoia in Teheran that the United States is determined to destroy Iran's Islamic republic. The initiative was so odd that the Administration (which calls Iran an "outlaw state") found itself in the bizarre position of weakening the covert program so its mandate did not include overthrowing Iran's Government.


https://www.thenation.com/article/how-newt-gingrich-crippled-congress/
	How Newt Gingrich Crippled Congress

	No single person bears more responsibility for how much Americans hate Congress than Newt Gingrich. Here’s what he did to it.

	...There is no greater pathology in today’s Congress than obstructionism, from Speaker John Boehner’s (R-OH) refusal to raise the debt ceiling in July to Majority Leader Eric Cantor (R-VA) taking disaster relief funds for Hurricane Irene hostage. Both parties have long used Congress’s procedural rules to promote legislation they favor, but Gingrich created something new. “There is the assumption—pioneered by Newt Gingrich himself, as early as the 1970s—that the minority wins when Congress accomplishes less,” Representative Steny Hoyer (D-MD), the number-two Democrat in the House, explained in a 2009 speech at the Center for American Progress Action Fund. “Gingrich’s proposition, and maybe accurately, was that as long as…our party cooperate[s] with Democrats and get[s] 20 or 30 percent of what we want and they get to say they solved the problem and had a bipartisan bill, there’s no incentive for the American people to change leadership,” Hoyer told the Washington Post after the speech. “To some degree, he was proven right in 1994.”


https://www.theguardian.com/theguardian/1999/jan/27/features11.g22
	Like pathologists trying to explain a freak viral outbreak, American historians have been poring over the McCarthyist phenomenon for the past half-century, striving to explain how a small group of legislators, the House Un-American Activities Committee, managed to paralyse US democracy and scar a generation.

	But the great, ironic secret at the committee's roots has emerged only now, in Moscow. According to newly unearthed KGB files, the committee's founding father - the man who paved the way for Senator Joe McCarthy's witch-hunts - was a Soviet spy.

	His name was Samuel Dickstein, a Democratic congressman from Manhattan who created the committee's prototype in 1934 as a means for hunting down home-grown Nazis.


http://www.rollingstone.com/politics/features/why-republicans-still-reject-the-science-of-global-warming-w448023
	It took a new generation of hard-line Republican politicians, led by House Speaker Newt Gingrich, to make the environment a partisan issue while positioning the GOP as the party of the fossil-fuel industry. Oil, gas and coal companies had typically divided their campaign donations evenly between the two parties; now they began funneling tens of millions of dollars to the GOP – two and three times more than Democrats received – and into front groups and sham think tanks working to undermine climate science. Flush with cash, the Republican leadership "started running the Congress from the top down," Waxman recalls. "Committees had less and less say over policy, decisions were made at the level of the speaker, and a lot of legislation was being drafted behind closed doors with special interests."


https://www.infowars.com/paper-global-warming-biggest-science-scandal-ever/
	Paper: ‘Global Warming’ Biggest Science Scandal Ever
	Globalists falsify temperature records


http://russia-insider.com/en/russia-already-knows-man-made-climate-change-hoax-now-west-waking/ri19041
	Russia Already Knows Man-Made Climate Change Is a Hoax. Now It's Time For the West to Wake Up

	Climate change is a fanatical western dogma based on fabricated data. And Russia is a proud and unapologetic heretic


https://www.newscientist.com/blogs/shortsharpscience/2009/12/since-over-1000-confidential-e.html
	Climategate: Russian secret service blamed for hack


This is a tactic that the Okhrana uses over and over again. The same principle works for animosity between countries, ethnic groups, really any groups of people that can be put in conflict: people who hate each other are inclined to blame each other for their problems. The famous Okhrana forgery "The Protocols of the Elders of Zion" (https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/The_Protocols_of_the_Elders_of_Zion) blamed a "global Zionist conspiracy" for much of the same kind of clandestine or subversive activities the Okhrana was up to, perhaps taking advantage of the antisemitism of the time. The KGB forgery "U.S. Army Field Manual 30-31B" (https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/U.S._Army_Field_Manual_30-31B) blamed U.S. military and intelligence agencies for the same. And the NKVD's "Tanaka Memorial" (https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Tanaka_Memorial) blamed Japanese leadership for incidents that, at least, had more than a few Okhrana fingerprints (see https://pastebin.com/e4qCs1AT). It can be said that animosity is another tool for the Okhrana to cover their tracks.

Clinton is also useful to them in this regard--it looks like there were attempts in Russian propaganda to blame Clinton for Justice Scalia's death, for example, and possibly some kind of effort to blame Clinton for the Russian print and social media propaganda targeting the left:


https://twitter.com/RogerJStoneJr/status/793147437389144064
	More dead than will fit in a Twitter animation, so many the artist got ill making it. #ClintonBodyCount #StopHillary http://stopthesteal.org 


https://www.infowars.com/wet-works-podesta-email-makes-assassination-reference-days-before-scalia-death/
	‘Wet Works’: Podesta Email Makes Assassination Reference Days Before Scalia Death
	“Didn't think wet works meant pool parties at the Vineyard.”

	Hillary Clinton campaign chairman John Podesta used a term known to reference assassination in an email sent to a lobbyist days before Supreme Court Justice Antonin Scalia’s mysterious death.


http://www.nydailynews.com/news/politics/killed-antonin-scalia-conspiracy-theorists-run-wild-article-1.2533100
	Who killed Antonin Scalia? Conspiracy theorists run wild 

	A blogger who conjures up conspiracy theories under the name Paladin Justice said Bill and Hillary Clinton may have orchestrated Scalia’s killing in an attempt to stifle a possible Supreme Court ruling over the former Secretary of State’s email controversy.


http://www.zerohedge.com/news/2016-04-25/hillary-unleashes-million-dollar-professional-internet-troll-army
	Hillary Clinton-aligned Super PAC, Correct the Record, is taking a page out of Vladimir Putin’s playbook by employing a $1 million dollar professional internet troll army to build a paid, positive consensus about the Clinton campaign. 


http://www.zerohedge.com/news/2016-10-08/podesta-files-show-illegal-coordination-david-brock-super-pac
	Another startling discovery from the "Podesta Emails" seems to indicate that the Clinton campaign openly coordinated with the "Correct The Record" Super PAC run by David Brock...which we believe is technically a felony.  That said, we're sure the FBI could find a way to argue the intent.  


http://www.mintpressnews.com/trolling-way-white-house-clinton-linked-pac-launches-1m-campaign-trump-bernie-bros/216264/
	Hillary Clinton is taking her battle for the White House to social media, as a new super PAC linked to her campaign prepares to spend big to participate in online flame wars.

	...Chris Matyszczyk, CNET’s reporter on online culture, suggested Clinton was adopting Trump’s tactics. “It’s not a pretty picture for Trump and it is, indeed, just the sort of thing he himself would release if he were running against himself,” he wrote of one ad earlier this month.

	Clinton is increasingly perceived to be losing control of the election, at least on social media. “The lack of engagement is one of Clinton’s bigger tactical vulnerabilities, particularly when compared with rivals like Donald Trump, whose viral social media attacks are legion, and Sen. Bernie Sanders, who is backed by a passionate army of media-savvy millennials,” Halper wrote.


http://www.zerohedge.com/news/2016-10-09/new-email-leak-reveals-unprecedented-coordination-between-hillary-campaign-and-press
	Newly Leaked Emails Reveal Unprecedented Coordination Between Hillary Campaign And Press

	It is no secret that the mainstream media has a "slight" left-leaning bias in their political reporting.  But newly leaked emails from Guccifer 2.0, obtained exclusively by The Intercept, reveal just how "cozy" and pervasive the Clinton campaign's relationship is with the press.  From "off-the-record dinners with the key national reporters" to feeding pre-written propaganda pieces to "friendly" journalists, the new leaks reveal startling coordination between the Clinton campaign and the mainstream media.

		...We have has a very good relationship with Maggie Haberman of Politico over the last year. We have had her tee up stories for us before and have never been disappointed.


This is another way Comey's decision worked in the Russians' favor: Russian propaganda had long built-up Clinton as some kind-of globally-connected, shadowy figure able to buy influence and buy her way out of justice--a fitting scapegoat. But Comey's handling of the case added to that perception, essentially that the system is rigged for shady, powerful people, and that Clinton is one of those people:


https://www.intellihub.com/clinton-family-criminal-roots-exposed/
	One woman even claimed that she “had sex” and did “cocaine” at toga parties” with Clinton’s crew and other prominent members of government and the police department on a number of occasions when Hillary, Bill’s wife, was “nowhere to be found.”

	At one point the criminal activity became so blatant that it was said to be commonly known throughout certain circles exactly what had been taking place, people even ended up dead. Many were awaiting indictments but the Clinton family tentacles were just too long and the path taken by investigators led to nowhere.


https://www.lewrockwell.com/lrc-blog/our-shadow-government-the-cfr/
	Hillary Clinton admits that the CFR runs the Government


https://www.infowars.com/hillary-to-use-shadow-government-to-cancel-the-election/
	Hillary To Use Shadow Government To Steal The Election
	A group literally called “the shadow government” was overseeing the Clinton email inquiry


http://www.mintpressnews.com/new-fbi-docs-reveals-shadowy-group-protected-clinton-email-investigation/221545/
	New FBI Docs Reveals Shadowy Group Protected Clinton In Email Investigation

	...In the FBI’s summary, the Shadow Government is said to have urged the FBI to drop the investigation documents all at once “for coordination purposes.” This information comes from an unidentified person, the FBI documents claim.


https://www.infowars.com/fbi-source-clinton-foundation-can-bring-down-entire-government/
	FBI Source: Clinton Foundation Can Bring Down Entire Government

	“There is enough for her and the entire government to be brought down,” he revealed. “People do not realize how enormous this whole situation actually is.”

	...“The problem is with the Clinton Foundation as I mentioned, which you should just imagine as a massive spider web of connections and money laundering implicating hundreds of high-level people,” the source said. “Though I do not have a high opinion of Hillary, she is just a piece – albeit a big piece – of this massive sh*tstorm.”

	...“Bill Clinton met with Lynch, and he was there to assure her that when Hillary gets to be president she’ll be able to keep her job,” said Nichols on the Alex Jones Show Friday. “I would imagine he gave Lynch a slip of paper that had on it a couple of things about the career prosecutors that are working the case. What was on that? The things they have on them. The drugs, women, men, whatever.”

	The source indicated the Clinton Foundation is likely a nexus of blackmail material keeping everyone in D.C. in line behind the Clintons – even those with tremendous influence.

	...Additionally, the source said the investigation took so long because FBI Director James Comey didn’t want to face the “Clinton Machine” and the “rest of Washington D.C.”

	“…This case would explode into a million other cases if fully brought to light, and then we would be one agency competing against the entire government and a hoard of other interests,” he continued. “


http://www.breitbart.com/2016-presidential-race/2016/09/10/exposed-fbi-director-james-comeys-clinton-foundation-connection/
	Exposed: FBI Director James Comey’s Clinton Foundation Connection


https://www.infowars.com/fbi-comey-a-clinton-fixer/
	Confirmed: Comey Planted Inside FBI as Clinton Fixer
	Former FBI Director made sure Clintons were never prosecuted

	FBI Director James Comey is a Clinton-fixer with a long history of running interference within the Department of Justice to make sure the Clintons are never prosecuted – a loyalty that the Clintons have repaid in corporate board appointments that have earned Comey millions of dollars.  


http://www.foxnews.com/opinion/2016/07/21/judge-napolitano-what-if-fix-was-in-for-hillary-at-obama-justice-department.html
	Judge Napolitano: What if the fix was in for Hillary at the Obama Justice Department?

	...What if FBI management began to intimidate FBI agents who had the goods on her? What if FBI management forced agents to sign highly irregular agreements governing what the agents can tell anyone when it comes to what they learned about Clinton?


The effect of this shouldn't be understated--a lot of Trump's campaign involved raging at the "lying mainstream media" and accusing Clinton of plotting to rig the election. But there was fairly-wide perception that the media was biased in favor of Clinton, and rumors that Clinton rigged the Democratic primary in ways beyond what was reveled by the DNC hacks. If Americans were suspicious that the justice system was rigged in favor of Hillary, it's not a large step to suspect the media or election systems could be rigged too:


http://www.huffingtonpost.com/tony-brasunas/only-voter-suppression-can-stop-bernie-sanders_b_9780128.html
	Only Voter Suppression Can Stop Bernie Sanders

	...The biggest issue, and something the corporate media barely touches, is that Hillary’s two wins over the past month  —  New York and Arizona  —  came in the two state primaries that were most fraught with problems and that are now under legal investigation.

	A similarity between the two states is disturbing. In both states, massive voter roll changes and purges took place in the days and weeks leading up to the primary, disqualifying thousands upon thousands of new Democratic voters.


http://time.com/4472169/russian-hackers-arizona-voter-registration/
	Russians Hacked Arizona Voter Registration Database -Official

	Russians were responsible for the recent breach of Arizona's voter registration system, the FBI told state officials in June.


http://www.gallup.com/poll/197090/majority-voters-think-media-favors-clinton.aspx
	WASHINGTON, D.C. -- Republican presidential nominee Donald Trump frequently accuses the media of biasing its coverage of the 2016 election campaign in favor of his Democratic opponent Hillary Clinton. A majority of registered voters (52%) agree with the Republican nominee. Meanwhile, 8% think the media favors Trump and 38% perceive no media bias.


https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=krP7rqYKHxs
	Bernie Sanders Schools Clueless News Anchor On Why Hillary Clinton Lost 


https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=J8cOLIOaikU
	What did CNN mean by this?


https://www.washingtonpost.com/news/volokh-conspiracy/wp/2016/10/17/remember-its-illegal-to-possess-wikileaks-clinton-emails-but-its-different-for-the-media-says-cnns-chris-cuomo/
	‘Remember, it’s illegal to possess’ WikiLeaks Clinton emails, but ‘it’s different for the media,’ says CNN’s Chris Cuomo


https://www.infowars.com/cnn-its-illegal-to-read-wikileaks-clinton-emails-you-have-to-go-through-us/
	CNN: “It’s Illegal” To Read Wikileaks Clinton Emails, You Have To Go “Through Us”
	"Everything you're learning about this, you're learning from us," he says

	...The most important up to this point, according to Wikileaks themselves, is the revelation Hillary Clinton knew Saudi Arabia and Qatar were funding ISIS in 2014 yet took over $30 million from both nations through her crooked foundation.

	Additionally, Bill Clinton was given a $1 million dollar “birthday check” from ISIS funding Qatar.

	These facts alone should be enough to indict both Hillary and Bill Clinton for treason, but the sold out GOP are a bunch of cowards and traitors and would prefer Hillary beat Trump so the rigged system continues unabated.


https://www.realclearpolitics.com/video/2017/05/16/cnns_chris_cuomo_thank_god_for_leakers.html
	CNN's Chris Cuomo: "Thank God For Those Leakers"

	CHRIS CUOMO, CNN ANCHOR: So, the president is once again providing the pathway to our understanding on something. The White House came out with a quick response in the form of General McMaster, respected national security adviser. He said, story is false that you heard. President didn't reveal any sources, methods or any military operations that weren't already public.

	Now, apple and oranges. That's not what "The Washington Post" reporting was about. It was about what the president may have given in detail of highly classified information that could allow the Russians to deconstruct, backtrack and find out where it might have come from.

	So, different things. But then the president this morning doesn't follow McMaster. He takes his own path, which is much closer to the reporting.

	...I have the absolute right to do, he says. Facts pertaining to terrorism and airline flight safety. Humanitarian reasons, plus, I want Russia to step up their fight against ISIS and terrorism. I have been asking Director Comey and others from the beginning of my administration to find the leakers in the intelligence community.

	Thank God for those leakers, Senator Sasse, otherwise we might not have known about this 


http://www.cnn.com/2017/05/15/politics/nancy-pelosi-cnn-town-hall/index.html
	Pelosi made her comments at a CNN town hall Monday evening moderated by anchor Chris Cuomo in the wake of a Washington Post report citing current and former US officials saying Trump revealed highly classified information in a meeting with Russian Foreign Minister Sergey Lavrov and Ambassador Sergey Kislyak last week.

	"It undermines the trust that we would have with our allies," Pelosi said.

	National Security Adviser H.R. McMaster pushed back on the report from the White House Monday evening, saying, "I was in the room. It didn't happen."
Pelosi said McMaster's response was not satisfactory.

	"I thought that the statement of McMaster's was sad for him, for him to be able to come out and speak in that way," Pelosi said. 

(OK, I put that last bit on Pelosi in there on purpose)


But it does look like a lot of the rigging by "Clinton agents" was, in fact, done by Russian agents.

This isn't to absolve Clinton of her misdeeds--Both Clinton and her husband have a long history of shady behavior:


https://www.highbeam.com/doc/1P2-4175323.html
	 WASHINGTON A federal judge Tuesday ordered the White House not to destroy any files, reports or correspondence that belonged to the now-disbanded health care task force headed by Hillary Rodham Clinton.

	U.S. District Judge Royce C. Lamberth, concerned about a report that boxes of task force mail have been shredded, told the administration to say who is in charge of the record-keeping.

	"I want a name and address of who's going to be accountable, and who's going to be held in contempt if there are documents destroyed," Lamberth said.


http://www.nytimes.com/1994/08/29/us/health-care-debate-what-went-wrong-health-care-campaign-collapsed-special-report.html
	THE HEALTH CARE DEBATE: What Went Wrong? How the Health Care Campaign Collapsed -- A special report.; For Health Care, Times Was A Killer

	...In hindsight, people who worked for the task force say its organization and secrecy planted the seeds of trouble for the President. 

	 The policy experts developing proposals for universal coverage, a comprehensive package of health benefits and Federal subsidies for poor people, rarely spoke to the fiscal experts. The task force deferred the discussion of costs. Experts on mental health and long-term care argued for a richer and richer package of benefits without knowing how much it would cost. Meeting, but Not Listening

	Mrs. Clinton and Mr. Magaziner met with many outside groups, but did not confide in them. After one such meeting, in March 1993, Dr. Quentin D. Young, chairman of Physicians for a National Health Program, which represents 6,000 doctors, said, "It was a magnificent exercise in pseudo openness." 


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Marc_Rich#U.S._indictment_and_pardon
	In 1983 Rich and partner Pincus Green were indicted on 65 criminal counts, including income tax evasion, wire fraud, racketeering, and trading with Iran during the oil embargo (at a time when Iranian revolutionaries were still holding American citizens hostage). The charges would have led to a sentence of more than 300 years in prison had Rich been convicted on all counts.

	...Learning of the plans for the indictment, Rich fled to Switzerland and, always insisting that he was not guilty, never returned to the U.S. to answer the charges. Rich's companies eventually pleaded guilty to 35 counts of tax evasion and paid $90 million in fines, although Rich himself remained on the Federal Bureau of Investigation's Ten Most-Wanted Fugitives List for many years, narrowly evading capture in Britain, Germany, Finland, and Jamaica.

	...On January 20, 2001, hours before leaving office, U.S. President Bill Clinton granted Rich a highly controversial presidential pardon.


https://www.usatoday.com/story/news/politics/onpolitics/2016/11/01/fbi-marc-rich-pardon-files/93136458/
	The FBI gave the Hillary Clinton campaign another unpleasant surprise Tuesday, this time releasing 129 pages of documents from a 2001 investigation into Bill Clinton's controversial presidential pardon of fugitive Marc Rich.

	..."This initial release consists of material from the FBI's files related to the William J. Clinton Foundation, a non-profit 501(c)(3) organization," reads a statement on the FBI records vault website. "The bulk of these records come from a 2001 FBI investigation into the pardon of Marc Rich (1934-2013), aka Marcell David Reich, by President Clinton in 2001;"

	...In a statement, the FBI said that any material requested three or more times under the Freedom of Information Act is automatically made available to the public online on a "first in, first out basis."

	...Comey took over the FBI probe into the Rich pardon in 2003 and the case was closed in 2005 with no charges filed...


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Marc_Rich#U.S._indictment_and_pardon
	...Denise Rich had given more than $1 million to Clinton's political party (the Democratic Party), including more than $100,000 to the Senate campaign of the president's wife, Hillary Rodham Clinton, and $450,000 to the Clinton Library foundation during Clinton's time in office.


http://www.nytimes.com/2002/06/21/us/prosecutors-clear-clintons-in-clemency-of-4-hasidic-men.html
	Federal prosecutors said yesterday that no criminal wrongdoing was committed when President Bill Clinton commuted the sentences of four swindlers from a Hasidic enclave in New York State that voted overwhelmingly for Senator Hillary Rodham Clinton.

	James B. Comey, the United States attorney for the Southern District of New York, said in a two-sentence statement that he had closed his investigation of clemency granted to the four men from New Square, N.Y.

	Mr. Comey said he would continue the investigation into the more than 170 other pardons and clemencies Mr. Clinton granted on his last day of office, including the one that has drawn the most ire: a pardon for the financier Marc Rich, a commodities trader who fled the country in 1983.

	The New Square case also drew attention because of its mix of the Clintons, New York ethnic politics and suggestions of vote-trading.
Continue reading the main story

	The four men, convicted of bilking the state and federal government of tens of millions of dollars, were prominent members of New Square, a reclusive Rockland County village. The village leaders' aggressive courting of the president and Mrs. Clinton before and after the 2000 Senate election raised questions of whether the men's sentences were reduced in exchange for votes.

	''The investigation was closed because we thoroughly investigated and determined it wasn't appropriate to bring charges against anybody in the case,'' Mr. Comey said at a news conference on an unrelated case. ''I can't really go into it because it was an investigation that didn't result in charges. That may be a frustrating answer, but that's the one I'm compelled to give.''


http://www.nytimes.com/1996/01/06/us/elusive-papers-of-law-firm-are-found-at-white-house.html
	Elusive Papers of Law Firm Are Found at White House

	After nearly two years of searches and subpoenas, the White House said this evening that it had unexpectedly discovered copies of missing documents from Hillary Rodham Clinton's law firm that describe her work for a failing savings and loan association in the 1980's.

	Federal and Congressional investigators have issued subpoenas for the documents since 1994, and the White House has said it did not have them. The originals disappeared from the Rose Law Firm, in which Mrs. Clinton was a partner, shortly before Mr. Clinton took office.

	The newly discovered documents are copies of billing records from the Rose firm, where Mrs. Clinton helped represent Madison Guaranty, a savings and loan run by James B. McDougal, the Clintons' business partner in the Whitewater land venture. The originals are still missing. Investigators have been seeking the documents to determine the role Mrs. Clinton played in the firm's representation of the savings and loan.

	The Clintons' personal lawyer, David E. Kendall, said tonight that the documents show that the work Mrs. Clinton performed was limited both in time and scope, as she has repeatedly said.

	But Representative Jim Leach, the Iowa Republican who heads the House Banking Committee, said he believed the billing records contradict Mrs. Clinton's account of her involvement with Madison, and show that her legal work for the savings and loan was "extensive and detailed."

	Senator Alfonse M. D'Amato, Republican of New York, tonight called the discovery of the copies of the records "the second miraculous discovery within the past 24 hours."

	Mr. D'Amato, who is chairman of the Senate Whitewater committee, was referring to the disclosure on Thursday of a two-year-old memorandum written by a former Presidential aide. The memorandum said that Mrs. Clinton had played a far greater role in the dismissal of employees of the White House travel office than the Administration has acknowledged.

	By their sheer volume -- 115 pages -- and the variety of contacts and conferences they document, the Rose billing records raise new questions about Mrs. Clinton's account of her work that are likely to give new impetus to investigations in Congress and by Federal prosecutors.

	...Investigators have also been trying to determine whether Mrs. Clinton sought to block Justice Department lawyers from examining files in Mr. Foster's office in the days after his death. White House aides searched the office and brought files to the Clintons' private residence before allowing investigators to look at them.


http://www.nytimes.com/1996/06/05/us/hillary-clinton-s-fingerprints-among-those-found-on-papers.html
	Hillary Clinton's Fingerprints Among Those Found on Papers

	Republicans on the special Senate Whitewater committee released a report from the Federal Bureau of Investigation today showing that the fingerprints of the First Lady, Hillary Rodham Clinton, were found on records discovered in the White House family quarters two years after they were first sought by investigators.

	...But Mark Fabiani, a special White House counsel, said Mrs. Clinton had acknowledged that she probably read the documents in 1992 during the election campaign when questions about Whitewater were being raised by reporters. He added that she had testified under oath that she had nothing to do with the documents during the two years they were missing and did not know how they ended up in the family quarters.


http://www.cbsnews.com/news/whitewater-case-closed/
	Six years and more than $50 million in taxpayer money later, an independent counsel has concluded there is "insufficient evidence" to charge President Clinton and First Lady Hillary Rodham Clinton with any criminal wrongdoing in the Whitewater land deal in Arkansas.

	"The invesigation in connection with Madison Guaranty / Whitewater matter is now closed," said Independent Counsel Robert Ray on Wednesday, hours after releasing his written statement on the matter.

	The White House immediately cheered the outcome as New York voters are just seven weeks away from deciding whether to elect Mrs. Clinton to the U.S. Senate.

	...In June, Ray found "substantial evidence" that Mrs. Clinton played a role in the purge of the White House press travel office. She swore to congressional investigators in 1996 that she had no role in the decision to fire the employees.

	In March, Ray concluded there is no credible evidence of criminal activity in the White House's improper gathering of hundreds of FBI background files of former Republican appointees.

	...Mrs. Clinton's billing records disclosed that she prepared a real estate document valuing a parcel of Castle Grande property at $400,000. The federal government got just $38,000 for it six years later following the S&L's collapse. Federal regulators concluded the S&L used the document prepared by Mrs. Clinton to deceive bank examiners about hundreds of thousands of dollars in commissions paid to Ward.

	Questioned about her work for the S&L, Mrs. Clinton said on 99 occasions in a two-and-a-half hour interview with federal regulators in 1996 that she was unable to recall it.

	The billing records reveal that Mrs. Clinton and Ward spoke at least 15 times from mid-November 1985 to June 1986 about Castle Grande and other business related to McDougal's S&L. Mrs. Clinton and Ward said they didn't recall the conversations. Ward died this year.

	The Clintons have criticized the Whitewater probe as politically motivated. 


http://www.washingtonpost.com/wp-srv/politics/special/whitewater/committee.pdf
	104TH CONGRESS

	INVESTIGATION OF WHITEWATER DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION AND RELATED MATTERS

	[pg 3 of 690]

	...JAMES B. COMEY, Deputy Special Counsel...


Rather, a lot of evidence points to Russian intelligence finding people like Bill and Hillary Clinton (or Trump for that matter) and promoting them to positions of power. This has already gotten too long, but it does look like the Russians have been interested in Clinton for awhile:


http://www.cnn.com/2017/05/09/politics/podesta-manafort-lobbying/index.html
	One of Washington's most powerful lobbying firms did not disclose the wide extent of its lucrative political work for a Ukrainian group tied to both onetime Trump adviser Paul Manafort and to pro-Russian politicians, new records show.

	The firm, the Podesta Group, said nothing in a 2012 lobbying report to Congress about at least 32 meetings, emails and other communications it had with the State Department, at a time when Secretary of State Hillary Clinton was scrutinizing Ukraine's upcoming election, records show.

	...The Podesta Group was representing a Ukrainian nonprofit, the European Centre for a Modern Ukraine, as it sought to counter the Obama administration's critical stance toward Ukraine's pro-Russia government and Congress' growing annoyance with Ukraine's leaders.


http://abcnews.go.com/Blotter/russian-fem-spy-cynthia-murphy-spooked-us/story?id=16061957
	Russian Fem Spy Spooked US, But It Wasn't Anna Chapman

	April 3, 2012 

 	A female Russian agent got "close enough" to a sitting U.S. cabinet member that the FBI felt they had to swoop in and arrest the lot -- but it wasn't the famous femme fatale Anna Chapman, federal officials said today. 

	...."We were becoming very concerned they were getting close enough to a sitting U.S. cabinet member that we thought we could no longer allow this to continue," Figliuzzi said. 

	 ...According to court documents relating to the spies' arrest, Murphy had been in contact with a fundraiser and "personal friend" of Hillary Clinton, who took the office of Secretary of State in January 2009. The fundraiser, Alan Patricof, said in a statement in 2010 he had retained Murphy's financial services firm more than two years before, had met with her a few times and spoke with her on the phone frequently. Patricof said they "never" spoke about politics, the government or world affairs.

	A spokesperson for Clinton told ABC News in 2010 that at the time there was "no reason to think the Secretary was a target of this spy ring." 


http://www.washingtonpost.com/wp-dyn/content/article/2010/06/29/AR2010062904525.html?hpid=topnews
	Clinton confidant believes he might have been spies' target

 	...Patricof said he was as surprised as everyone else by his involvement, albeit peripherally, with the spies.

	"It's just staggering," said Patricof in a telephone interview. "It's off the charts." 

	..A shocked Patricof reiterated in the interview that, "We never discussed anything but paying the bills." 

 	..."This is the most wild story ever," said Patricof. 


http://politicalticker.blogs.cnn.com/2014/03/11/hillary-clinton-donor-back-in-the-fundraising-mix/comment-page-1/
	Hillary Clinton donor back in the fundraising mix

	(CNN) - After Hillary Clinton lost the 2008 primary to President Barack Obama, Alan Patricof, a wealthy financier who had helped raise sizable donations to the Clinton campaign, took a step back from politics.

	...Attendees to the Tuesday night fundraiser paid the maximum allowable campaign donation for an individual under current campaign laws: $32,400 per person.

	...Patricof has been a longtime supporter of Clinton. In 2008, he was part of a loyal group of fundraisers – called the "Hillraisers" – who donated and bundled millions of dollars for the then-senator's White House bid.

	When asked by CNN earlier this year if he would look to bundle and fundraise for Clinton in 2016 – should she run – he said, "Yes, I can say that with certainty."

	"I remain a Clinton supporter," Patricof said. "I definitely am very supportive of Hillary should she decide to go forward."

	In the invitation to the Obama fundraiser, Patricof acknowledged his "various efforts to convince Hillary to run in 2016 and to demonstrate financial, as well as moral support, if she decides to go forward."


http://thehill.com/blogs/ballot-box/229759-clinton-fundraiser-donors-tripping-over-themselves-to-back-hillary
	Longtime Hillary Clinton friend and fundraiser Alan Patricof says that major Democratic donors are "tripping over themselves" to donate to the former secretary of State.

	Appearing on "Bloomberg Surveillance" on Friday, Patricof was asked if "all of the deep Democratic pockets" are still behind Clinton. 


https://www.usnews.com/news/politics/articles/2015/08/28/clinton-quietly-trying-to-discourage-biden-from-a-2016-bid
	In ways both subtle and blunt, Hillary Rodham Clinton's campaign is sending a message to Vice President Joe Biden about his potential presidential campaign: This won't be easy.

	...Donors who have publicly expressed support for a Biden run have later been contacted by the Clinton team, according to fundraisers and Democratic strategists who spoke on condition of anonymity because they were not authorized to discuss the private conversations. Even Clinton herself has made a few calls, they said, to express her disappointment in the defector.


http://thehill.com/blogs/ballot-box/229759-clinton-fundraiser-donors-tripping-over-themselves-to-back-hillary
	..."Based on the number of calls I get on a daily basis, I’d say people are tripping over themselves. That’s why you have the formation of this organization called Ready for Hillary," Patricof said. 


Supposedly, Russian agents helped Clinton's Senate campaign too (some rough notes here: https://pastebin.com/Vx46ZcAM Also, the so called Mahogany Row "Shadow Government," who tried to cover-up Clinton's email scandal but ended up sensationalizing it, would be another good place to look for Russian agents.)

A theme is that Hillary Clinton, Bill Clinton, and Trump all have something wrong with them--like they can't help lying or acting corruptly. The reader by now can guess what damage can be done to American society by promoting corrupt and unstable people to positions of power and influence.

Russian spies are said to be opportunistic in their scouting for future American leaders:


http://articles.latimes.com/2011/oct/31/nation/la-na-russian-spies-20111101
	Russian spies were succeeding, FBI official says

	The 10 sleeper agents exposed in 2010 were reportedly succeeding in efforts to rise in American society and gain connections to policymakers. 

	...The agents, whom the U.S. sent to Russia in July 2010 in the largest spy swap since the Cold War, are not accused of stealing any U.S. secrets. But they were more dangerous than commonly believed, C. Frank Figliuzzi, FBI assistant director for counterintelligence, said in an interview.

	They were "the cream of the crop" of trained Russian intelligence agents, he said, and they were sent here to blend in and befriend American policymakers. They were succeeding, Figliuzzi said.


http://www.newsbusters.org/blogs/nb/noel-sheppard/2010/07/10/biden-tells-leno-he-wanted-send-rush-limbaugh-russia-spy-swap
	LENO: Are they just sort of like moles, they just sort of plant people here and say, "See what you can find out?" Or do they come with a specific mission, "You're going to go work for Lockheed" or "You're going to work for..."

	BIDEN: The former. 


https://newrepublic.com/article/63602/now-we-know
	June 17, 2009

	But amusing though the details may be, the most significant contribution of Klehr's and Haynes's book is its revelation of the sheer extent of Soviet espionage in America, and the numbers of people involved in it. Despite the length of this hefty volume, Haynes and Klehr discuss only a portion of some five hundred agents who at some point worked for the KGB, and about whom some details can be found in Vassiliev's notes or in the Venona files. Not all of these people were actually passing on information. Some worked as handlers, couriers, recruiters and talent spotters. The role of others may well have been exaggerated, as critics have pointed out, by the eager workers of the KGB--though certainly not all of them, given the specific details of information handed over.

	If only a quarter of the people whose names appear in the files were truly agents, the numbers are still much larger than anyone previously suspected, and they represent a far deeper penetration into American society than we have hitherto known. As it turns out, the KGB in the 1930s had agents or contacts in the State Department, the Commerce Department, the Justice Department, and the OSS, the wartime intelligence agency. KGB associates were scattered throughout the Manhattan Project as well as in research institutions and private companies specializing in chemistry, aviation engineering, and physics. There were agents in the media and the literary world. The KGB even tried, not very successfully, to recruit Ernest Hemingway.


https://www.theguardian.com/world/2010/jul/09/spy-swap-whos-who-russia
	Cynthia Murphy, married to Richard Murphy, lived in a suburban neighbourhood in Montclair with their daughters, Kate, 11, and Lisa, 9. Concealing her true name Lydia Guryev, the 39-year-old worked for Morea Financial Services, a lower Manhattan-based accounting firm that offered tax advice, earning $135,000 a year, and had recently earned her MBA.

	Prosecutors said one of her assignments had been to network with Columbia University students.


https://books.google.com/books?id=JI6ZBQAAQBAJ&pg=PA115
	The 2009 case of Russian spy Lidiya Gurveva (using the name Cynthia Murphy) is particularly illustrative of how the campus environment can be exploited merely to collect information on professors and students. Gurveva was pursuing an MBA degree at Columbia Business School ... when her handlers gave her the following assignment:

		[S]trengthen...ties w classmates on daily basis .... [r]eport to C[enter] on their detailed personal data and character traits w. preliminary conclusions about their potential (vulnerability) to be recruited by Service.

	They also directed Gurveva to "dig up personal data of those students who apply (or are hired already) for a job at the CIA"


https://www.fbi.gov/news/stories/operation-ghost-stories-inside-the-russian-spy-case
	The deep-cover Russian spies may not have achieved their objective, but they were not idle. They collected information and transmitted it back to Russia, and they were actively engaged in what is known in the spy business as “spotting and assessing.”

	They identified colleagues, friends, and others who might be vulnerable targets, and it is possible they were seeking to co-opt people they encountered in the academic environment who might one day hold positions of power and influence.

	Perhaps the most famous example of this tactic—the Cambridge Five—took place in Great Britain. Soviet intelligence “talent spotters” were able to recruit Cambridge University students in the 1930s—including future spy Kim Philby—who would later rise to power in the British government and become Soviet operatives during World War II and into the 1950s.

	“We believe the SVR illegals may well have hoped to do the same thing here,” said a counterintelligence agent.


http://abcnews.go.com/Politics/russian-spies-eye-golden-prize-white-house-source/story?id=45531117
	“They always targeted political figures,” David Major, a retired FBI counterintelligence agent explained to ABC News. “They want to know who is a mover and shaker in our society, who affects it.”

	And today as questions continue to mount over what contacts Trump campaign aides may have had with Russian intelligence operatives, the White House continues to dispute media reports that any of the president’s associates had such contact while on the campaign trail.

	U.S. intelligence officials say the Russians are engaged in a massive campaign to infiltrate and disrupt American politics. It has gone on for decades, originally with the Cold War goal of placing a mole inside the White House, a retired KGB officer who once ran spy operations in Washington told ABC News.


Between Trump, Gore (see https://pastebin.com/r5PHGSnz), and Clinton (and Nixon? Obama?), we can make a good guess that part of what they're looking for is people who are craven, depraved, or morally flexible who they can promote in American society.


http://uselessdissident.blogspot.com/2008/11/interview-with-yuri-bezmenov-part-three.html
	This was my instruction: try to get into large-circulation, established conservative media; reach filthy-rich movie makers; intellectuals, so-called ‘academic’ circles; cynical, egocentric people who can look into your eyes with angelic expression and tell you a lie. These are the most recruitable people: people who lack moral principles, who are either too greedy or too [much] suffer from self importance. They feel that they matter a lot. These are the people who[m] [the] KGB wanted very much to recruit.


http://uselessdissident.blogspot.com/2008/12/love-letter-to-america-part-two.html
	...Do not shun the aid of the lowest and most despicable individuals of your enemy's country...

 
(And to be clear Clinton, Trump, and Gore don't strike me as willing or witting agents, and I guess there are different levels of "recruiting" somebody--just having Russian agents in a position to advise them might be enough to make them unwitting agents.)


And a dishonest and loathed agent of influence is more useful than one might think--remember how Gore helped the Russians politicize climate change:


https://www.livescience.com/22069-polarization-climate-science.html
	...Part of the problem is that climate change has moved out of the realm of research and into the political arena

	...This was in the midst of the polarizing Clinton administration, and for some, the association made global warming belief seem unsavory. Even today, many climate-change naysayers think of former vice president Al Gore when they hear the words "climate change."

	"They loathe Al Gore," Leiserowitz said. "Sometimes I joke that Al Gore could hold a press conference tomorrow to say that science has determined that the Earth is round and people out there would say, 'Well, no it isn't.'" 


It's often that the best way to get someone to believe a lie is to let them know you're a liar and tell them the truth. For Clinton, Comey's handling of the email probe brought her dishonesty and penchant for scheming to the forefront of national attention:


https://www.washingtonpost.com/politics/even-without-charges-fbi-rebuke-leaves-a-heavy-political-cloud-over-clinton/2016/07/05/79b6f712-42c8-11e6-bc99-7d269f8719b1_story.html
 	FBI rebuke leaves a heavy political cloud over Clinton 

	Public polls show that many voters do not trust Clinton and that the email controversy already has harmed her political standing. Polls consistently show that roughly two-thirds of Americans do not consider Clinton “honest and trustworthy” — typically her lowest rating in a series of attribute questions.


https://www.washingtonpost.com/news/the-fix/wp/2016/07/25/4-brutal-poll-numbers-that-greet-hillary-clinton-at-the-democratic-national-convention/
	4 brutal poll numbers that greet Hillary Clinton at the Democratic National Convention

	July 25, 2016

	...68 percent say Clinton isn't honest and trustworthy

	That's according to the CNN poll, and it's her worst number on-record. It's also up from 65 percent earlier this month and 59 percent in May. The 30 percent who see Clinton as honest and trustworthy is now well shy of the number who say the same of Trump: 43 percent.

	You heard that right: Trump — he of the many, many Pinocchios — now has a large lead on Clinton when it comes to honesty and trustworthiness.

	...Her image has never been worse

	...Gallup's new numbers on Monday — 38 percent favorable and 57 percent unfavorable — are also unprecedented over the course of Clinton's political career.

	This also appears to be the first time ever that Clinton's image measures worse than Trump's. It does so in both polls.


But this was just in time for Clinton to start using Trump's ties to Russia as a campaign talking point:


https://www.washingtonpost.com/news/the-fix/wp/2016/07/24/here-are-the-latest-most-damaging-things-in-the-dncs-leaked-emails/
	Here are the latest, most damaging things in the DNC’s leaked emails 

	July 25, 2016


http://www.cnn.com/2016/07/24/politics/robby-mook-russia-dnc-emails-trump/index.html
	Clinton's campaign manager: Russia helping Trump

	Mon July 25, 2016

	Hillary Clinton's campaign manager is alleging that Russian hackers are leaking Democratic National Committee emails critical of Bernie Sanders in an effort to help Donald Trump win the election in November. 

	..."I don't think it's coincidental that these emails were released on the eve of our convention here, and I think that's disturbing," he said. 

	...Mook downplayed the possibility that the email release will rip open divides between supporters of Clinton and Sanders just before the Democratic National Convention kicks off in Philadelphia. 


https://www.washingtonpost.com/news/the-fix/wp/2016/07/24/here-are-the-latest-most-damaging-things-in-the-dncs-leaked-emails/
	...Many of the most damaging emails suggest the committee was actively trying to undermine Bernie Sanders's presidential campaign.

	...When the Sanders campaign alleged that the Clinton campaign was improperly using its joint fundraising committee with the DNC to benefit itself, Clinton campaign lawyer Marc Elias offered the DNC guidance on how to respond.

	"My suggestion is that the DNC put out a statement saying that the accusations the Sanders campaign are not true,"

	...On May 21, DNC national press secretary Mark Pautenbach suggested pushing a narrative that Sanders "never ever had his act together, that his campaign was a mess."

	After detailing several arguments that could be made to push that narrative, Paustenbach concludes: "It's not a DNC conspiracy, it's because they never had their act together."


http://www.reuters.com/article/us-usa-cyber-democrats-idUSKCN10B0ST
	Mon Aug 1, 2016 

	Clinton says Russia behind DNC hacking, draws line to Trump

	U.S. Democratic presidential candidate Hillary Clinton said on Sunday that Russian intelligence services hacked into Democratic National Committee computers and she questioned Republican rival Donald Trump's overtures to Russian President Vladimir Putin.

	"We know that Russian intelligence services hacked into the DNC and we know that they arranged for a lot of those emails to be released and we know that Donald Trump has shown a very troubling willingness to back up Putin, to support Putin," Clinton said in an interview with "Fox News Sunday."

	The United States has not publicly accused Russia of being behind the hack of Democratic Party computers.


http://thehill.com/blogs/ballot-box/presidential-races/290540-new-clinton-video-questions-trumps-ties-to-putin
	Clinton video questions Trump's ties to Putin

	A new video from Hillary Clinton's campaign questions Donald Trump's connections to Russian leader Vladimir Putin and suggests the Kremlin may be trying to influence the U.S. presidential election. 

	...The video also hits Trump for complimenting the Russian president. 

	It displays the text "We don't know why Trump praises Putin" before playing a video clip of the Republican presidential nominee saying Putin has been a "very strong leader."

	The video also questions Trump campaign chief Paul Manafort's ties to Putin, referencing his work with a former pro-Putin prime minister in the Ukraine.

	"We don't know why Russia is trying to influence this election," the text continues ahead of video clips tying Russia to leaked emails from Democratic National Committee leaders. 

	"We don't know what's going on here, and Donald won't tell us," the text concludes. "We'll let you guess." 


http://www.breitbart.com/big-government/2016/09/06/russian-conspiracy-hillary-clinton-absurd-trump/
	Hillary Clinton’s Absurd, McCarthyist Russian Conspiracy Theory

 	Democratic presidential nominee Hillary Clinton reiterated her campaign’s bizarre conspiracy theory Monday that Russia is working with Donald Trump to steal the 2016 election. 


http://www.cnn.com/2016/07/24/politics/robby-mook-russia-dnc-emails-trump/index.html
	"What a joke," Trump senior communications adviser Jason Miller said in a statement. "This shows that Hillary Clinton will do and say anything to win the election and hold onto power in the rigged system."

	Donald Trump Jr., the son of the Republican nominee, also bashed Mook's comments later on "State of the Union."

	"It just goes to show you their exact moral compass. I mean they'll say anything to be able to win this. This is time and time again, lie after lie," Trump Jr. told Tapper. "It's disgusting. It's so phony. I watched him bumble through the interview."

	He added "These lies and the perpetuating of nonsense to try to gain some political capital is outrageous and he should be ashamed of himself."


http://21stcenturywire.com/2016/11/01/hillarys-russian-hack-hoax-the-biggest-lie-of-this-election-season/
	Hillary’s ‘Russian Hack’ Hoax: The Biggest Lie of This Election Season

	...Anyone who was paying attention back then knew this ‘Russian hack’ talking point was purely political, but then again, who’s really paying attention these days? Certainly not the US media.

	...as Charles Lane of the Washington Post pointed out on Fox News’ Special Report later that day, the Russians are no longer communists


http://thehill.com/blogs/ballot-box/presidential-races/289420-trump-i-hope-russia-is-able-to-get-clintons-emails
	Trump: 'I hope' Russia is able to get Clinton's emails
	07/27/16

	Trump on Clinton's email: "Russia, if you're listening, I hope you're able to find the 30K emails that are missing" pic.twitter.com/zU83hXkEuy

	Donald Trump on Wednesday said he hopes that Russian hackers have obtained the tens of thousands of emails that Hillary Clinton deleted from her private email server. 


https://www.infowars.com/wikileaks-assange-hillary-tries-to-link-trump-to-putin-to-hide-her-many-connections-to-russia-video-2/
	WikiLeaks’ Assange: Hillary Tries To Link Trump To Putin To Hide Her ‘Many Connections’ To Russia [VIDEO]

	“My analysis of Trump and Russia is that there is no substantial connection.”


http://www.zerohedge.com/news/2017-03-24/deep-states-dominant-narratives-and-authority-are-crumbling
	The Deep State's Dominant Narratives And Authority Are Crumbling

	...If various Security Agencies sign off on the narrative that "Russia hacked our election" (a nonsense claim from the start, given the absurd imprecision of the "hacking"--hacking into what? Voting machines? Electoral tallies?), and that narrative is evidence-free and fact-free, i.e. false, then the expertise and authority of those agencies comes into legitimate question.

	...[picture of Boris and Natasha]

	The dominant narrative: these two are the source of all our problems.


https://theintercept.com/2016/08/08/dems-tactic-of-accusing-adversaries-of-kremlin-ties-and-russia-sympathies-has-long-history-in-us/
	Democrats’ Tactic of Accusing Critics of Kremlin Allegiance Has Long, Ugly History in U.S.
	Glenn Greenwald

	A frequent weapon for Democrats in the 2016 election is to publicly malign those they regard as critics and adversaries as Russia sympathizers, Putin stooges, or outright agents of the Kremlin. To put it mildly, this is not a new tactic in U.S. political discourse, and it’s worth placing it in historical context. That’s particularly true given how many people have now been targeted with this attack.

	Strongly insinuating that the GOP nominee, Donald Trump, has nefarious, possibly treasonous allegiances to Moscow has migrated from Clinton-loyal pundits into the principal theme of the Clinton campaign itself. “The depth of Trump’s relationship with the Kremlin is revealing itself by the day,” her website announced yesterday

	...But this smear tactic extends far beyond Trump. It is now used to vilify anyone perceived to be an impediment to Clinton’s victory.

	...When Bernie Sanders looked earlier this year to be the one who was standing in Clinton’s way, slimy suggestions began emerging of his dark connections to Russia.

	...Trump, WikiLeaks, Sanders, The Intercept, Jill Stein. Other than loyal Clinton supporters, is there anyone left who is not covertly controlled by or in service to The Ruskies?


https://www.theguardian.com/commentisfree/2013/may/06/syria-israel-bombing-moral-relativism
 	Israeli bombing of Syria and moral relativism
	Glenn Greenwald

	...but then argues that the attack on Syria is justified, in part, by the fact that Assad has "apparently" used "chemical weapons" on his own people. The only problem...


To summarize, this is what happened:


- Clinton spends most of her life acting suspiciously and being dishonest, generally sets herself up as a villain

- James Comey draws attention to her email scandal in an unprecedented and galvanizing way, the world learns Clinton is a liar

- Clinton chooses the DNC leaks, of all things, to tie her opponent to Russia and further her campaign (which looks dishonest anyway, as if this were a strategy to dismiss the leaks), and does this ahead of the USIC

- Trump and the media do the rest of the work to downplay (welcome, even) or politicize Russia's meddling


Knowing how partisan motivated reasoning and "the messenger overwhelming the message" works, the outcome was predictable:


https://d25d2506sfb94s.cloudfront.net/cumulus_uploads/document/6oxnwsm36w/econTabReport.pdf#page=181
	July 30 - August 1, 2016

	From what you have heard, do you believe the Russian govenrment is responsible for hacking the DNC computers and leaking the emails? 

	                            Total   Democrat  Independent  Republican
	Russia is responsible       29%     42%       25%          18%
	Russia is not responsible   22%     17%       22%          28%   
	Not sure                    49%     41%       54%          53%


	...Do you think Donald Trump's remarks about Russian finding Hillary Clinton's emails were appropriate or inappropriate?

	                            Total   Democrat  Independent  Republican
	Appropriate                 27%     11%       27%          51%
	Inappropriate               58%     83%       54%          32%   
	Don't Know                  14%      5%       20%          17%


http://www.businessinsider.com/putin-poll-favorability-trump-2016-9
	According to a YouGov/Economist poll, Putin's favorability rating in July 2014, after the Russian annexation of Crimea, was -54 among Democrats and -66 among Republicans.

	A poll from the same outlets released in August 2016 showed that Putin's favorability rating among Democrats remained identical. But the Russian leader's rating among Republicans improved dramatically, from -66 to -27.


Comey and Clinton helped politicize Russia's interference, making debate on how to respond impossible (see: global warming) and, critically, giving Russian spies in Congress cover to downplay or ignore Russian meddling (Clinton's "hypocrisy" about her own Russian ties might be meant to help with this too). For some Republicans, Clinton and the "enemy of my enemy is my friend" effect might have made Putin look better, too.

In that sense, Clinton has been useful to the Russian government for awhile:


https://twitter.com/HillaryClinton/status/452130729691201536/photo/1
	Great to meet the strong & brave young women from #PussyRiot, who refuse to let their voices be silenced in #Russia.

	--Hillary Clinton


http://www.hollywoodreporter.com/news/pussy-riot-hillary-clinton-we-916063
	Pussy Riot on Hillary Clinton: "We Would Be Happy if America Chose a Woman" (Exclusive)

 	...Russia's punk provocateurs weigh in on how the DNC email scandal reminds them of life under Putin: "We are watched." 

	..."I do not believe that the ex-KGB is able to hit someone who is really strong," she said. "We would be happy if America chose a woman for president. It would be a wonderful sign that America is the land of opportunity."

	...Asked to comment on Russia's involvement in the hack, she said she couldn't say who, specifically, was behind the cyberattack. "Luckily I am not an agent of the Russian security services"

(she may or may not be an agent of the Russian security services)


http://www.nytimes.com/2011/12/06/world/europe/russian-parliamentary-elections-criticized-by-west.html
	“A big hello to you,” says the cameraman, Yegor Duda, a 33-year-old volunteer election observer. “This is a violation of the criminal code. The chairman of the electoral commission is filling out ballots. Everything has been captured on the video camera,” he said.

	Mr. Duda raced home and uploaded the clip to YouTube. Though just three minutes long, it quickly became an election-day sensation, helping fuel a major demonstration of as many as 5,000 people on Monday evening in central Moscow. They chanted “Russia without Putin!” and “Putin is a thief.”  Several hundred were arrested, including two major opposition leaders. 


http://www.cnn.com/2011/12/06/world/europe/russia-elections-clinton/index.html
	Secretary of State Hillary Clinton called for a "full investigation" of irregularities in Sunday's parliamentary elections in which the party of Russian Prime Minister Vladimir Putin appears to have suffered a serious setback.

	"We have serious concerns about the conduct of the election," she said Tuesday as ministers gathered for a meeting of the Organization for Security and Cooperation in Europe.

	..."The Russian people, like people everywhere, deserve the right to have their voices heard and their votes counted," Clinton said. "And that means they deserve free, fair, transparent elections and leaders who are accountable to them."


http://www.nytimes.com/2011/12/09/world/europe/putin-accuses-clinton-of-instigating-russian-protests.html
	Putin Contends Clinton Incited Unrest Over Vote

	In a rare personal accusation, Mr. Putin said Mrs. Clinton had sent “a signal” to “some actors in our country” after Sunday’s parliamentary elections, which were condemned as fraudulent by both international and Russian observers. Anger over the elections prompted a demonstration in which thousands chanted “Putin is a thief” and “Russia without Putin,” a development that has deeply unnerved the Kremlin.

	Speaking to political allies as he announced the formation of his presidential campaign, Mr. Putin said that hundreds of millions of dollars in “foreign money” was being used to influence Russian politics, and that Mrs. Clinton had personally spurred protesters to action. The comments indicate a breakdown in the Obama administration’s sputtering effort to “reset” the relationship between the United States and Russia.

	...“She set the tone for some actors in our country and gave them a signal,” Mr. Putin continued. “They heard the signal and with the support of the U.S. State Department began active work.”


http://www.ecfr.eu/article/commentary_how_russia_has_come_to_loathe_the_west311346
	Putin’s first public reaction to the protests was to blame the US. “Certain figures in Russia,” he said, “heard the signal and, with the support of the US Department of State, began active work.” In the following months, the term “GosDep” (the Russian acronym for the US State Department) became a political slur that stood for the “evil America” that was plotting against Russia. The pro-Kremlin propagandists launched a smear campaign aimed at discrediting the protesters by portraying them as serving the anti-Russian interests of the West. These accusations were soon extended to liberal journalists as well as civic and political activists, who were commonly condemned as the “fifth column” and “national traitors”.


For Russia, Clinton is the perfect boogeyman. Just like Gore has the power to make people believe global warming is a myth, Clinton discredits the people and ideas she claims to support. The idea that Russian agents helped Clinton's career shouldn't be surprising--she makes a mockery of our country:


http://www.nytimes.com/2009/02/19/washington/19diplo.html
	Clinton Praises Indonesian Democracy

	“Indonesia has experienced a great transformation in the last 10 years,” she said, referring to the Asian financial crisis of 1998, which led to the ouster of Suharto, its autocratic president, and set Indonesia on the path to becoming a robust democracy.

	“If you want to know if Islam, democracy, modernity and women’s rights can coexist, go to Indonesia,” she said at a dinner of academics, journalists, environmentalists and women’s rights advocates.


http://freebeacon.com/politics/clinton-connections-paid-off-for-indonesian-tobacco-tycoon/
	Clinton Connections Paid Off for Indonesian Tobacco Tycoon’s Group

	An Indonesian tobacco magnate secured U.S. government assistance for his foundation after donating to Hillary Clinton’s and hiring lobbyists, themselves Clinton Foundation donors, who worked for Hillary Clinton’s 2008 presidential campaign.

	The Putera Sampoerna Foundation, founded by the Indonesian tobacco heir Putera Sampoerna, got the U.S. government to underwrite millions in loans offered by the foundation and secured high-profile support for its activities from Sec. Clinton and other senior federal officials.


http://newsinfo.inquirer.net/788562/indonesia-on-track-to-worlds-highest-smoking-rates
	Loose regulations have also allowed the tobacco industry to target children, resulting in 20.3 per cent of teenagers aged 13 to 15 becoming smokers.

	In 2011, Philip Morris subsidiary Sampoerna erected a billboard in Jakarta depicting a young man reaching out to catch up with friends on a bus, with the slogan: “Dying is better than leaving a friend. Sampoerna is a cool friend.”


http://www.nydailynews.com/news/world/indonesian-boy-6-praised-cutting-5-cigs-day-article-1.2161081
	Indonesian boy, 6, praised for cutting down to 5 cigs a day


http://www.businesswire.com/news/home/20130614005845/en/Clinton-Global-Initiative-Announces-Program-Train-Thousands
	Clinton Global Initiative Announces New Program to Train Thousands of Women Entrepreneurs

	Senator Hillary Clinton Highlights Importance of Supporting Women-Owned Businesses

	A new online business training program for women entrepreneurs across America was featured today by Senator Hillary Rodham Clinton at the Clinton Global Initiative America (CGI) meeting in Chicago. American DreamBuilder: The Women’s Business Creator, is being created by Bluedrop Performance Learning, Freeport-McMoRan Copper & Gold Inc.


http://www.washingtonexaminer.com/clinton-helped-companies-that-donated-to-foundation-profit-off-africa/article/2564001
	Clinton helped companies that donated to foundation profit off Africa

	...At the time, Lundin owned a 24.75 percent stake in the mine and another company, Freeport-McMoran Copper & Gold, owned 57.5 percent, leaving the Congolese government in control of 17.5 percent of the mine.

	Freeport is also a major Clinton Foundation donor, giving between $250,000 and $500,000, according to donor records.

	The Congolese government saw its stake in the mine climb by just 2.5 percent in 2010 after talks that were thought to have been conducted by the State Department "in support of Freeport," the Financial Times reported that year.


https://thunderbird.asu.edu/knowledge-network/clinton-global-initiative-america
	Behind the Scenes at the Clinton Global Initiative America

	On Friday June 14th, I stood on stage at the CGI America meeting beside my colleagues Tracy Bame from Freeport McMoRan Copper and Gold


https://www.theatlantic.com/international/archive/2011/11/is-a-us-mining-company-funding-a-violent-crackdown-in-indonesia/249164/
	Is a U.S. Mining Company Funding a Violent Crackdown in Indonesia?

	...The strikers have a reason to be wary for their safety: Freeport is paying millions of dollars directly to the police officers who guard its mine, although Indonesia's police force has a history of brutality and corruption.

	...Rights organizations fear the security payments are tainting police neutrality in the region

	...In October, police officers opened fire on striking Freeport workers who were trying to board Freeport buses from the nearby town of Timika to demonstrate by the mine's gate. One striker died from gunshot wounds

	...Freeport has given $79.1 million to police and military forces in the past 10 years, according to a group called Indonesian Corruption Watch.  Most of that funding has been through in-kind contributions such as food, housing, fuel, and travel costs, but officers have also received direct payments.


Putin doesn't like democracy, and Clinton has reliably played the part of Putin's foil. She cheapens everything she says.

Reportedly, Putin and his associates don't like women either:


http://motto.time.com/4400914/fox-roger-ailes-gretchen-carlson-harassment/
	At least 6 more women have accused the Fox News CEO of harassment

	...One, Kellie Boyle, alleges that Ailes propositioned her in 1989 after learning she was to sign a contract with the National Republican Congressional Committee. After she refused him, she was passed over for the job. 

	...Another woman, Marsha Callahan, was a model when she met Ailes in the 60s. She auditioned for The Mike Douglas Show, which he was producing at the time. She says he specifically requested that she wear a garter belt to the interview and that he asked her to lift her skirt up several times during their conversation. Callahan says that he told her that she needed to sleep with him to get the job, and that he said, “Oh, pretty girls like you are a dime a dozen.”


http://www.independent.co.uk/news/world/americas/fox-donald-trump-pussy-grabbing-access-hollywood-harassment-seminars-hollywood-reporter-a7675451.html
	Fox uses Trump's 'pussy grabbing tapes to teach employees about harassment'


http://www.nbcnews.com/news/world/putin-officially-divorces-his-wife-lyudmila-n70141
 	Russian President Vladimir Putin has formally divorced his wife Lyudmila after more than 30 years of marriage, Kremlin spokesman said on Wednesday, following a surprise breakup announcement last year.

	"The divorce has taken place," Dmitry Peskov said, without giving any further details. 

	...In 2008, Putin said there was no truth to a newspaper report that he was preparing to marry Olympic rhythmic gymnast Alina Kabayeva, who was born in 1983, the same year he married Lyudmila.

	Putin told journalists to keep their "snotty noses" out of his private affairs and the newspaper, Moskovsky Korrespondent, folded shortly afterwards. 


https://www.theatlantic.com/politics/archive/2014/02/vladmir-putins-very-flexible-girlfriend-rumored-light-olympic-torch/357799/
	Vladimir Putin's Very Flexible Girlfriend Rumored to Light the Olympic Torch

	Alina Kabaeva is a 2004 Olympic champion in rhythmic gymnastics. She could be the one to light the Olympic flame at Sochi's opening ceremonies.


http://www.telegraph.co.uk/news/worldnews/europe/russia/8865545/Vladimir-Putin-a-wife-beater-and-philanderer-documents-allege.html
	Vladimir Putin 'a wife beater and philanderer', documents allege 

	 The documents from the archive of the BND, Germany's spy agency, paint a dark picture of the Russian prime minister, who plans to return to the presidency next year.

	Gathering information through the work of an agent posing as an interpreter for Ludmilla Putina, Mr Putin's wife, the BND heard that the then youthful 33-year-old spy chief was a "wife beater and a philanderer" during his stint in the German city from 1985 to 1990. 


http://time.com/4663532/russia-putin-decriminalize-domestic-abuse/
	Vladimir Putin Just Signed Off on the Partial Decriminalization of Domestic Abuse in Russia

	Russian President Vladimir Putin has signed off on a law that partially decriminalizes domestic abuse, a measure that sailed easily through the country’s socially conservative legislature despite pushback from women's- and children’s-rights advocates.


http://www.propornot.com/p/the-list.html
	...amren.com...beforeitsnews.com...dailystormer.com...


https://www.amren.com/features/2015/06/the-cult-of-white-extinction-and-how-to-reverse-it/
	...Feminism is also an important factor in the decline in fertility in the West. White women have always been especially susceptible to feminism...


http://it-video.beforeitsnews.com/opinion-conservative/2015/05/obama-clinton-want-christians-to-change-our-beliefs-not-going-to-happen-3009326.html
	Obama & Clinton Want Christians To Change Our Beliefs – Not Going To Happen

	...Hilly has just said that we have to change what we believe in to support the Radical Feminist and Gay agendas. 


https://www.dailystormer.com/evil-wench-accuses-glorious-leader-of-collaborating-with-glorious-leader-east/
	Evil Wench Accuses Glorious Leader of Collaborating with Glorious Leader East

	Hillary Clinton, a braindamaged feminist icon who is running for President in America, has adjusted her tinfoil hat and accused the last White nation of supporting the last White candidate.

	...Hillary Clinton accused Russian intelligence of interfering with the American election


Reportedly, Putin tries to push a "traditional" and "patriarchal" society on the Russian people (https://www.theddguardian.com/commentisfree/2017/mar/22/vladimir-allies-russias-iron-ladies-useful-anti-feminists), and there's evidence he's trying to push that here too. For whatever reason, Putin seems to want women around the world to be submissive to men (It's fitting then, that if you look at the timeline of the Flynn controversy https://pastebin.com/nCwti01C it looks like Russian agents tripping over themselves trying everything they can to stop former AG Sally Yates).

But Clinton, with her uncanny power to discredit whatever she claims to stand for, helped Putin promote that idea too:


https://twitter.com/alanjpatricof/status/797805521420091392
	My beef over Hillary Clinton's loss is with liberal feminists, young and old https://www.theguardian.com/commentisfree/2016/nov/12/hillary-clinton-liberal-feminists?CMP=share_btn_tw-as … always Tina Brown says it best!

	--Alan Patricof


https://www.theguardian.com/commentisfree/2016/nov/12/hillary-clinton-liberal-feminists
	 My beef over Hillary Clinton's loss is with liberal feminists, young and old
	Tina Brown

	...“She was my champion. I miss her,” my 26-year-old daughter grieved last night. Every disappointed Democratic supporter has her own target for anger, it seems. My daughter’s is her fellow millennials, who didn’t come out in enough numbers to take Clinton to the White House. Clinton won this group by 54%, six points down from Obama in 2012. Always in a storm of umbrage about micro-aggressions, those crucial solipsistic stay-at-home millennials wound up enabling the macro-aggression of Donald Trump.


http://www.washingtontimes.com/news/2016/apr/27/hillary-clinton-welcomes-trumps-woman-card-attack/
	‘Deal me in:’ Clinton welcomes Trump’s ‘woman card’ attack


https://www.hillaryclinton.com/post/om-what-hillary-clinton-said-after-becoming-first-woman-top-major-party-presidential-ticket/
https://m.hrc.onl/cms/original_images/27009973360_5c73d18c80_o.jpg
	"Woman Card"


https://www.hillaryclinton.com/post/om-what-hillary-clinton-said-after-becoming-first-woman-top-major-party-presidential-ticket/
	For the first time in history, ninety-six years after women first won the right to vote, a woman will be a major party’s nominee for President of the United States.

	After making history, Hillary Clinton had a message to share with the country: Tonight is for all of us—and the future we’re building together.

	"Tonight’s victory is not about one person. It belongs to generations of women and men who struggled and sacrificed and made this moment possible."

	"We all believe that America succeeds when more people share in our prosperity; when more people have a voice in our political system; when more people can contribute to their communities. We believe that cooperation is better than conflict, unity is better than division, empowerment is better than resentment, and bridges are better than walls."


http://www.bbc.com/news/av/election-us-2016-37329812/clinton-half-of-trump-supporters-basket-of-deplorables
	Clinton: Half of Trump supporters 'basket of deplorables'


https://www.hillaryclinton.com/post/om-what-hillary-clinton-said-after-becoming-first-woman-top-major-party-presidential-ticket/
    	..."Now you are writing a new chapter of that story. This campaign is about making sure there are no ceilings—no limits—on any of us."


http://www.reuters.com/article/us-usa-election-biden-idUSKCN0QV01U20150826
	As U.S. Vice President Joe Biden considers jumping into the 2016 White House race, the Democratic donor class appears relatively united in its support of front-runner Hillary Clinton.

	"I like Joe Biden very much, but it's time to line up for Hillary and we are lining up," said Karin Birkeland, a top Democratic bundler for President Barack Obama in 2012 who recently committed to Clinton. "She has by far the best resume, she's ready, she's younger and she's a woman."


http://thehill.com/homenews/campaign/299892-millennials-lack-enthusiasm-for-clinton-trump
	Millennials lack enthusiasm for Clinton, Trump

	...But the lack of enthusiasm felt by young voters interviewed by The Hill is clear. That’s a complication for Clinton


https://www.dailydot.com/layer8/elizabeth-warren-vp-yik-yak-survey/
	Millennials really want Hillary Clinton to pick Elizabeth Warren for VP 

	...they overwhelmingly favor Clinton tapping the consumer-advocate-turned-progressive-lawmaker for VP. Seventy-four percent of respondents wanted Clinton to pick Warren. Only 9 percent favored Sen. Tim Kaine 


http://www.politico.com/story/2016/06/elizabeth-warren-wall-street-vice-president-224489
	Big Wall Street donors have a message for Hillary Clinton: Keep Elizabeth Warren off the ticket or risk losing millions of dollars in contributions.


http://abcnews.go.com/Politics/transcript-hillary-clintons-interview-abc-news-anchor-david/story?id=39676932
	MUIR: The last 24 hours, Senator Tester, a key Democratic leader, was asked about the idea of a Clinton-Warren ticket. Elizabeth Warren, of course. He answered, ‘Is the country ready for two women? I don’t know.’ 

 	CLINTON: Well, I’m not gonna get into vice presidential choices but I have the highest regard for Senator Warren. 
	
	MUIR: Let’s put her name aside though. Do you think the country would be ready for two women?

	CLINTON: I think at some point. Maybe this time, maybe in the future. But we’re gonna be looking for the most qualified person to become president should something happen to me, if I’m fortunate enough to be the president.


https://www.theguardian.com/us-news/2017/apr/06/hillary-clinton-interview-election-russia-misogyny
	Hillary Clinton: misogyny 'certainly' played a role in 2016 election loss

	In first post-election interview, former Democratic presidential candidate calls for US intervention in Syria and a ‘patriotic’ investigation into Russia


http://www.propornot.com/p/the-list.html
	...infowars.com ... prisonplanet.com ... newstarget.com...


https://www.infowars.com/trump-if-hillary-were-a-man-she-wouldnt-even-win-a-city-council-election/
	Trump: If Hillary Were A Man She Wouldn’t Even Win A City Council Election
	Presumptive GOP nominee once again refuses to rule out nuking ISIS.

	...In an appearance on NBC’s Today, Trump said that if Hillary were a man, she wouldn’t even be able to win a local election.

	“The primary thing that she has going is that she’s a woman and she’s playing that card like I have never seen anybody play it before,” Trump said Thursday morning.


https://www.prisonplanet.com/total-desperation-sets-in-as-president-obama-plays-the-woman-card.html
	Total Desperation Sets In as President Obama Plays the Woman Card

	With neither the racist nor the Putin-puppet label sticking to Trump, team Clinton and its lobotomized surrogates have regressed back to square one: playing the woman card.

	As I noted in a post earlier this week, a professor of linguistics at Berkeley just published an article at Time claiming (with zero evidence of course), that the Hillary Clinton email server scandal only exists because she is a woman.  Here’s a brief snippet of what she said:

		...I am mad. I am mad because I am scared. And if you are a woman, you should be, too. Emailgate is a bitch hunt, but the target is not Hillary Clinton. It’s us.

		The only reason the whole email flap has legs is because the candidate is female...

	I know. It’s really hard to believe the above is real, but it is.


http://www.newstarget.com/2016-11-08-why-hillary-clintons-fact-less-feminist-arguments-are-anything-but-womens-rights.html
	Why Hillary Clinton’s fact-less ‘feminist arguments’ are anything BUT women’s rights

	One of Hillary Clinton’s biggest weapons is the fact that she is a woman.

	In 2016, there are few tools greater than this one, which goes to show just how far feminism has drifted from its original purpose. Instead of promoting the equality of women, the modern feminist movement exists solely to silence men who happen to disagree with leftists on any subject


Active measures is sort-of like putting on a play (the historian Andrew Wilson calls it "political technology" https://www.opendemocracy.net/od-russia/andrew-wilson/political-technology-why-is-it-alive-and-flourishing-in-former-ussr): agents of influence play the part of protagonists and their foils, and their sum influence on the public is not so much what they say as it is the "lesson" of the "story" these agents play-out. Think I.F. Stone, playing a sort of "voice of reason" to McMarthy's "wild conspiracy theorist" (remember the Soviet spy Dickstein was his predecessor), with the moral of the story being "maybe Soviet influence operations aren't that big a deal after all."

From what can be gathered from their propaganda, the Okhrana's play was, roughly, this: America is an "imperialist" country, imposing a "decedent" Western version of democracy and equality on the rest of the world. Clinton, apparently, was meant to play the part of the corrupt, hypocritical Western leader who pays lip-service to these values only to grab power for herself. Comey's decision to let her off without a trial was where the villain's true colors are revealed, before Trump, the heroic underdog, finally defeats her, perhaps a prelude to Trump's final showdown with the shadowy and scheming "deep state." Clinton played her part well.

As for Comey, I think they've got a part written for him in the final act. The point of the rest of this letter is to guess the script and spoil the ending.


https://pastebin.com/dyid21cM
